Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5917.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 81. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who assaults or assaults and batters an individual, if no other punishment is prescribed by law, is guilty of a misdemeanor felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 93 days 1 year or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. If the victim of a violation under this subsection is a health professional or medical volunteer and the violation occurs while the victim is performing the victim's duties as a health professional or medical volunteer, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. The enhanced fine under this subsection does not apply if the defendant is a patient who is receiving treatment from the victim. (2) Except as provided in subsection (3), (4), or (5), an individual who assaults or assaults and batters the individual's spouse or former spouse, an individual with whom the individual has or has had a dating relationship, an individual with whom the individual has had a child in common, or a resident or former resident of the individual's household, is guilty of a misdemeanor felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 93 days 4 years or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (3) An individual who assaults or assaults and batters an individual who is pregnant and who knows the individual is pregnant is guilty of a misdemeanor felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 93 days 2 years or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (4) An individual who commits an assault or an assault and battery in violation of subsection (2) or (3), and who has previously been convicted of assaulting or assaulting and battering an individual described in either subsection (2) or subsection (3) under any of the following, is guilty of a misdemeanor felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 1 year 2 years and 6 months or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both: (a) This section or an ordinance of a political subdivision of this state substantially corresponding to this section. (b) Section 81a, 82, 83, 84, or 86. (c) A law of another state or an ordinance of a political subdivision of another state substantially corresponding to this section or section 81a, 82, 83, 84, or 86. (5) An individual who commits an assault or an assault and battery in violation of subsection (2) or (3), and who has 2 or more previous convictions for assaulting or assaulting and battering an individual described in either subsection (2) or subsection (3) under any of the following, is guilty of a felony ï¿½punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 years 1 year or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both: (a) This section or an ordinance of a political subdivision of this state substantially corresponding to this section. (b) Section 81a, 82, 83, 84, or 86. (c) A law of another state or an ordinance of a political subdivision of another state substantially corresponding to this section or section 81a, 82, 83, 84, or 86. (6) This section does not apply to an individual using necessary reasonable physical force in compliance with section 1312 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1312. (7) The operator of a health facility or agency or a hospital or psychiatric hospital shall post a sign in the health facility or agency or hospital or psychiatric hospital in a prominent and visible location that provides that a person, other than a patient receiving treatment, who assaults a health professional or medical volunteer in violation of this section is subject to the enhanced fine provided for in this section and that a patient receiving treatment who assaults a health professional or medical volunteer may still be subject to prosecution under this section. (8) As used in this section: (a) "Dating relationship" means frequent, intimate associations primarily characterized by the expectation of affectional involvement. This term does not include a casual relationship or an ordinary fraternization between 2 individuals in a business or social context. (b) "Health facility or agency" means a health facility or agency licensed under article 17 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20101 to 333.22260. (c) "Health professional" means an individual who is employed or granted privileges by or under contract with a hospital or psychiatric hospital, health facility or agency, health system, or health care provider, whether operated by a governmental unit or a private entity, and whose duties within the scope of that employment, privilege, or contract involve the provision of direct patient care and require licensure, registration, certification, or other regulation or authorization under the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.1101 to 333.25211, or who is providing indirect patient care under the direction of a hospital or psychiatric hospital, health facility or agency, health system, or health care provider. (d) "Hospital or psychiatric hospital" means a hospital or psychiatric hospital licensed under the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106. (e) "Medical volunteer" means an individual who is volunteering at a hospital or psychiatric hospital, health facility or agency, in a health system, or with a health care provider, whether operated by a governmental unit or a private entity, and whose duties as a volunteer involve the provision of direct patient care, or who is providing indirect patient care under the direction of a hospital or psychiatric hospital, health facility or agency, health system, or health care provider. Sec. 81a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who assaults an individual without a weapon and inflicts serious or aggravated injury upon that individual without intending to commit murder or to inflict great bodily harm less than murder is guilty of a misdemeanor felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 1 year 2 years or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. If the victim of a violation under this subsection is a health professional or medical volunteer and the violation occurs while the victim is performing the victim's duties as a health professional or medical volunteer, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. The enhanced fine under this subsection does not apply if the defendant is a patient who is receiving treatment from the victim. (2) Except as provided in subsection (3), an individual who assaults the individual's spouse or former spouse, an individual with whom the individual has or has had a dating relationship, an individual with whom the individual has had a child in common, or a resident or former resident of the same household without a weapon and inflicts serious or aggravated injury upon that individual without intending to commit murder or to inflict great bodily harm less than murder is guilty of a misdemeanor felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 1 year 2 years or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (3) An individual who commits an assault and battery in violation of subsection (2), and who has 1 or more previous convictions for assaulting or assaulting and battering the individual's spouse or former spouse, an individual with whom the individual has or has had a dating relationship, an individual with whom the individual has had a child in common, or a resident or former resident of the same household, in violation of any of the following, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 10 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both: (a) This section or an ordinance of a political subdivision of this state substantially corresponding to this section. (b) Section 81, 82, 83, 84, or 86. (c) A law of another state or an ordinance of a political subdivision of another state substantially corresponding to this section or section 81, 82, 83, 84, or 86. (4) The operator of a health facility or agency or a hospital or psychiatric hospital shall post a sign in the health facility or agency or hospital or psychiatric hospital in a prominent and visible location that provides that a person, other than a patient receiving treatment, who assaults a health professional or medical volunteer in violation of this section is subject to the enhanced fine provided for in this section and that a patient receiving treatment who assaults a health professional or medical volunteer may still be subject to prosecution under this section. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Dating relationship" means frequent, intimate associations primarily characterized by the expectation of affectional involvement. This term does not include a casual relationship or an ordinary fraternization between 2 individuals in a business or social context. (b) "Health facility or agency" means a health facility or agency licensed under article 17 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20101 to 333.22260. (c) "Health professional" means an individual who is employed or granted privileges by or under contract with a hospital or psychiatric hospital, health facility or agency, health system, or health care provider, whether operated by a governmental unit or a private entity, and whose duties within the scope of that employment, privilege, or contract involve the provision of direct patient care and require licensure, registration, certification, or other regulation or authorization under the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.1101 to 333.25211, or who is providing indirect patient care under the direction of a hospital or psychiatric hospital, health facility or agency, health system, or health care provider. (d) "Hospital or psychiatric hospital" means a hospital or psychiatric hospital licensed under the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106. (e) "Medical volunteer" means an individual who is volunteering at a hospital or psychiatric hospital, health facility or agency, in a health system, or with a health care provider, whether operated by a governmental unit or a private entity, and whose duties as a volunteer involve the provision of direct patient care, or who is providing indirect patient care under the direction of a hospital or psychiatric hospital, health facility or agency, health system, or health care provider. Sec. 81d. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4), an individual who assaults, batters, wounds, resists, obstructs, opposes, or endangers a person who the individual knows or has reason to know is performing his or her duties is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 2 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (2) An individual who assaults, batters, wounds, resists, obstructs, opposes, or endangers a person who the individual knows or has reason to know is performing his or her duties causing a bodily injury requiring medical attention or medical care to that person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 4 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (3) An individual who assaults, batters, wounds, resists, obstructs, opposes, or endangers a person who the individual knows or has reason to know is performing his or her duties causing a serious impairment of a body function of that person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 15 8 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (4) An individual who assaults, batters, wounds, resists, obstructs, opposes, or endangers a person who the individual knows or has reason to know is performing his or her duties causing the death of that person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (5) This section does not prohibit an individual from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law that is committed by that individual while violating this section. (6) A term of imprisonment imposed for a violation of this section may run consecutively to any term of imprisonment imposed for another violation arising from the same transaction. (7) As used in this section: (a) "Obstruct" includes the use or threatened use of physical interference or force or a knowing failure to comply with a lawful command. (b) "Person" means any of the following: (i) A police officer of this state or of a political subdivision of this state, including, but not limited to, a motor carrier officer or capitol security officer of the department of state police. (ii) A police officer of a junior college, college, or university who is authorized by the governing board of that junior college, college, or university to enforce state law and the rules and ordinances of that junior college, college, or university. (iii) A conservation officer of the department of natural resources or the department of environmental quality.environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (iv) A conservation officer of the United States department of the interior.Department of the Interior. (v) A sheriff or deputy sheriff. (vi) A constable. (vii) A peace officer of a duly authorized police agency of the United States, including, but not limited to, an agent of the secret service or department of justice.Secret Service or Department of Justice. (viii) A firefighter. (ix) Any emergency medical service personnel described in section 20950 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20950. (x) An individual engaged in a search and rescue operation as that term is defined in section 50c. (c) "Serious impairment of a body function" means that term as defined in section 58c of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.58c. Sec. 82. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection or subsection (2), a person who assaults another person with a gun, revolver, pistol, knife, iron bar, club, brass knuckles, or other dangerous weapon without intending to commit murder or to inflict great bodily harm less than murder is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 4 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. If the victim of a violation under this subsection is a health professional or medical volunteer and the violation occurs while the victim is performing the victim's duties as a health professional or medical volunteer, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $4,000.00, or both. The enhanced fine under this subsection does not apply if the defendant is a patient who is receiving treatment from the victim. (2) A person who violates subsection (1) in a weapon free school zone is guilty of a felony punishable by 1 or more of the following: (a) Imprisonment for not more than 4 years. (b) Community service for not more than 150 hours. (c) A fine of not more than $6,000.00. (3) The operator of a health facility or agency or a hospital or psychiatric hospital shall post a sign in the health facility or agency or hospital or psychiatric hospital in a prominent and visible location that provides that a person, other than a patient receiving treatment, who assaults a health professional or medical volunteer in violation of this section is subject to the enhanced fine as provided for in this section and that a patient receiving treatment who assaults a health professional or medical volunteer may still be subject to prosecution under this section. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Health facility or agency" means a health facility or agency licensed under article 17 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20101 to 333.22260. (b) "Health professional" means an individual who is employed or granted privileges by or under contract with a hospital or psychiatric hospital, health facility or agency, health system, or health care provider, whether operated by a governmental unit or a private entity, and whose duties within the scope of that employment, privilege, or contract involve the provision of direct patient care and require licensure, registration, certification, or other regulation or authorization under the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.1101 to 333.25211, or who is providing indirect patient care under the direction of a hospital or psychiatric hospital, health facility or agency, health system, or health care provider. (c) "Hospital or psychiatric hospital" means a hospital or psychiatric hospital licensed under the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106. (d) "Medical volunteer" means an individual who is volunteering at a hospital or psychiatric hospital, health facility or agency, in a health system, or with a health care provider, whether operated by a governmental unit or a private entity, and whose duties as a volunteer involve the provision of direct patient care, or who is providing indirect patient care under the direction of a hospital or psychiatric hospital, health facility or agency, health system, or health care provider. (e) "School" means a public, private, denominational, or parochial school offering developmental kindergarten, kindergarten, or any grade from 1 through 12. (f) "School property" means a building, playing field, or property used for school purposes to impart instruction to children or used for functions and events sponsored by a school, except a building used primarily for adult education or college extension courses. (g) "Weapon free school zone" means school property and a vehicle used by a school to transport students to or from school property. Sec. 83. Assault with intent to commit murderï¿½Any A person who shall assault assaults another with intent to commit the crime of murder , shall be is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for life or any number term of years but not less than 15 years. Sec. 84. (1) A person who does either of the following assaults another person with intent to do great bodily harm, less than the crime of murder is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 7 years and 6 months or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. : (a) Assaults another person with intent to do great bodily harm, less than the crime of murder. (2) (b) Assaults A person who assaults another person by strangulation or suffocation is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not less than 4 years. (3) (2) As used in this section, "strangulation or suffocation" means intentionally impeding normal breathing or circulation of the blood by applying pressure on the throat or neck or by blocking the nose or mouth of another person. (4) (3) This section does not prohibit a person from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law arising out of the same conduct as the violation of this section. Sec. 85. (1) A person who, with the intent to cause cruel or extreme physical or mental pain and suffering, inflicts great bodily injury or severe mental pain or suffering upon another person within his or her custody or physical control commits torture and is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not less than 25 years. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Cruel" means brutal, inhuman, sadistic, or that which torments. (b) "Custody or physical control" means the forcible restriction of a person's movements or forcible confinement of the person so as to interfere with that person's liberty, without that person's consent or without lawful authority. (c) "Great bodily injury" means either of the following: (i) Serious impairment of a body function as that term is defined in section 58c of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.58c. (ii) One or more of the following conditions: internal injury, poisoning, serious burns or scalding, severe cuts, or multiple puncture wounds. (d) "Severe mental pain or suffering" means a mental injury that results in a substantial alteration of mental functioning that is manifested in a visibly demonstrable manner caused by or resulting from any of the following: (i) The intentional infliction or threatened infliction of great bodily injury. (ii) The administration or application, or threatened administration or application, of mind-altering substances or other procedures calculated to disrupt the senses or the personality. (iii) The threat of imminent death. (iv) The threat that another person will imminently be subjected to death, great bodily injury, or the administration or application of mind-altering substances or other procedures calculated to disrupt the senses or personality. (3) Proof that a victim suffered pain is not an element of the crime under this section. (4) A conviction or sentence under this section does not preclude a conviction or sentence for a violation of any other law of this state arising from the same transaction. Sec. 86. Assault with intent to maimï¿½Any A person who shall assault assaults another with intent to maim or disfigure his the other person by cutting out or maiming the tongue, putting out or destroying an eye, cutting or tearing off an ear, cutting or slitting or mutilating the nose or lips, or cutting off or disabling a limb, organ, or member , shall be is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 5 years or by a fine of not more than 5,000 dollars.$5,000.00. Sec. 87. Assault with intent to commit felony, not otherwise punishedï¿½Any A person who shall assault assaults another person, with intent to commit any burglary, or any other felony, the punishment of which assault is not otherwise in this act prescribed, shall be is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 5 years , ï¿½or by impose a fine of not more than 5,000 dollars.$5,000.00. Sec. 88. Assault with intent to rob and steal being unarmedï¿½Any A person, not being armed with a dangerous weapon, who shall assault assaults another person with force and violence , and with the intent to rob and steal, shall be is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for life or any term of years but not more less than 15 7 years and 6 months. Sec. 89. Assault with intent to rob and steal being armedï¿½Any A person, being armed with a dangerous weapon, or any article used or fashioned in a manner to lead a person so assaulted reasonably to believe it to be a dangerous weapon, who shall assault assaults another person with the intent to rob and steal shall be is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for life , or for any term of years but not less than 7 years and 6 months. Sec. 91. Attempt to murder by poisoning, etc.ï¿½Any A person who shall attempt attempts to commit the crime of murder by poisoning, drowning, or strangling another person, or by any means not constituting the crime of assault with intent to murder, shall be is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for life or any term of years but not less than 25 years. Sec. 110a. (1) As used in this section: (a) "Dwelling" means a structure or shelter that is used permanently or temporarily as a place of abode, including an appurtenant structure attached to that structure or shelter. (b) "Dangerous weapon" means 1 or more of the following: (i) A loaded or unloaded firearm, whether operable or inoperable. (ii) A knife, stabbing instrument, brass knuckles, blackjack, club, or other object specifically designed or customarily carried or possessed for use as a weapon. (iii) An object that is likely to cause death or bodily injury when used as a weapon and that is used as a weapon or carried or possessed for use as a weapon. (iv) An object or device that is used or fashioned in a manner to lead a person to believe the object or device is an object or device described in subparagraphs (i) to (iii). (c) "Without permission" means without having obtained permission to enter from the owner or lessee of the dwelling or from any other person lawfully in possession or control of the dwelling. (2) A person who breaks and enters a dwelling with intent to commit a felony, larceny, or assault in the dwelling, a person who enters a dwelling without permission with intent to commit a felony, larceny, or assault in the dwelling, or a person who breaks and enters a dwelling or enters a dwelling without permission and, at any time while he or she is entering, present in, or exiting the dwelling, commits a felony, larceny, or assault is guilty of home invasion in the first degree if at any time while the person is entering, present in, or exiting the dwelling either of the following circumstances exists: (a) The person is armed with a dangerous weapon. (b) Another person is lawfully present in the dwelling. (3) A person who breaks and enters a dwelling with intent to commit a felony, larceny, or assault in the dwelling, a person who enters a dwelling without permission with intent to commit a felony, larceny, or assault in the dwelling, or a person who breaks and enters a dwelling or enters a dwelling without permission and, at any time while he or she is entering, present in, or exiting the dwelling, commits a felony, larceny, or assault is guilty of home invasion in the second degree. (4) A person is guilty of home invasion in the third degree if the person does either of the following: (a) Breaks and enters a dwelling with intent to commit a misdemeanor in the dwelling, enters a dwelling without permission with intent to commit a misdemeanor in the dwelling, or breaks and enters a dwelling or enters a dwelling without permission and, at any time while he or she is entering, present in, or exiting the dwelling, commits a misdemeanor. (b) Breaks and enters a dwelling or enters a dwelling without permission and, at any time while the person is entering, present in, or exiting the dwelling, violates any of the following ordered to protect a named person or persons: (i) A probation term or condition. (ii) A parole term or condition. (iii) A personal protection order term or condition. (iv) A bond or bail condition or any condition of pretrial release. (5) Home invasion in the first degree is a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 20 10 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (6) Home invasion in the second degree is a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 15 5 years or a fine of not more than $3,000.00, or both. (7) Home invasion in the third degree is a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (8) The court may order a term of imprisonment imposed for home invasion in the first degree to be served consecutively to any term of imprisonment imposed for any other criminal offense arising from the same transaction. (9) Imposition of a penalty under this section does not bar imposition of a penalty under any other applicable law. Sec. 111. Any person An individual who, without breaking, enters any dwelling, house, tent, hotel, office, store, shop, warehouse, barn, granary, factory or other building, boat, ship, shipping container, railroad car, or structure used or kept for public or private use, or any private apartment therein, with intent to commit a felony or any larceny therein, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not less than 2 more than 5 years and 6 months or a fine of not more than $2,500.00. Sec. 122. (1) A person shall not give, offer to give, or promise anything of value to an individual for any of the following purposes: (a) To discourage any individual from attending a present or future official proceeding as a witness, testifying at a present or future official proceeding, or giving information at a present or future official proceeding. (b) To influence any individual's testimony at a present or future official proceeding. (c) To encourage any individual to avoid legal process, to withhold testimony, or to testify falsely in a present or future official proceeding. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to the reimbursement or payment of reasonable costs for any witness to provide a statement to testify truthfully or provide truthful information in an official proceeding as provided for under section 16 of the uniform condemnation procedures act, 1980 PA 87, MCL 213.66, or section 2164 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2164, or court rule. (3) A person shall not do any of the following by threat or intimidation: (a) Discourage or attempt to discourage any individual from attending a present or future official proceeding as a witness, testifying at a present or future official proceeding, or giving information at a present or future official proceeding. (b) Influence or attempt to influence testimony at a present or future official proceeding. (c) Encourage or attempt to encourage any individual to avoid legal process, to withhold testimony, or to testify falsely in a present or future official proceeding. (4) It is an affirmative defense under subsections (1) and (3), for which the defendant has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence, that the conduct consisted solely of lawful conduct and that the defendant's sole intention was to encourage, induce, or cause the other person to testify or provide evidence truthfully. (5) Subsections (1) and (3) do not apply to any of the following: (a) The lawful conduct of an attorney in the performance of his or her duties, such as advising a client. (b) The lawful conduct or communications of a person as permitted by statute or other lawful privilege. (6) A person shall not willfully impede, interfere with, prevent, or obstruct or attempt to willfully impede, interfere with, prevent, or obstruct the ability of a witness to attend, testify, or provide information in or for a present or future official proceeding. (7) A person who violates this section is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 4 2 years and 6 months or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (b) If the violation is committed in a criminal case for which the maximum term of imprisonment for the violation is more than 10 years, or the violation is punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 5 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (c) If the violation involves committing or attempting to commit a crime or a threat to kill or injure any person or to cause property damage, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 15 10 years or a fine of not more than $25,000.00, or both. (8) A person who retaliates, attempts to retaliate, or threatens to retaliate against another person for having been a witness in an official proceeding is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more than 10 less than 5 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. As used in this subsection, "retaliate" means to do any of the following: (a) Commit or attempt to commit a crime against any person. (b) Threaten to kill or injure any person or threaten to cause property damage. (9) This section applies regardless of whether an official proceeding actually takes place or is pending or whether the individual has been subpoenaed or otherwise ordered to appear at the official proceeding if the person knows or has reason to know the other person could be a witness at any official proceeding. (10) This section does not prohibit a person from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law arising out of the same transaction as the violation of this section. (11) The court may order a term of imprisonment imposed for violating this section to be served consecutively to a term of imprisonment imposed for the commission of any other crime including any other violation of law arising out of the same transaction as the violation of this section. (12) As used in this section: (a) "Official proceeding" means a proceeding heard before a legislative, judicial, administrative, or other governmental agency or official authorized to hear evidence under oath, including a referee, prosecuting attorney, hearing examiner, commissioner, notary, or other person taking testimony or deposition in that proceeding. (b) "Threaten or intimidate" does not mean a communication regarding the otherwise lawful access to courts or other branches of government, such as the otherwise lawful filing of any civil action or police report of which the purpose is not to harass the other person in violation of section 2907 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2907. Sec. 136b. (1) As used in this section: (a) "Child" means a person who is less than 18 years of age and is not emancipated by operation of law as provided in section 4 of 1968 PA 293, MCL 722.4. (b) "Cruel" means brutal, inhuman, sadistic, or that which torments. (c) "Omission" means a willful failure to provide food, clothing, or shelter necessary for a child's welfare or willful abandonment of a child. (d) "Person" means a child's parent or guardian or any other person who cares for, has custody of, or has authority over a child regardless of the length of time that a child is cared for, in the custody of, or subject to the authority of that person. (e) "Physical harm" means any injury to a child's physical condition. (f) "Serious physical harm" means any physical injury to a child that seriously impairs the child's health or physical well-being, including, but not limited to, brain damage, a skull or bone fracture, subdural hemorrhage or hematoma, dislocation, sprain, internal injury, poisoning, burn or scald, or severe cut. (g) "Serious mental harm" means an injury to a child's mental condition or welfare that is not necessarily permanent but results in visibly demonstrable manifestations of a substantial disorder of thought or mood which that significantly impairs judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to cope with the ordinary demands of life. (2) A person is guilty of child abuse in the first degree if the person knowingly or intentionally causes serious physical harm or serious mental harm to a child. Child abuse in the first degree is a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not less than 15 years. (3) A person is guilty of child abuse in the second degree if any of the following apply: (a) The person's omission causes serious physical harm or serious mental harm to a child or if the person's reckless act causes serious physical harm or serious mental harm to a child. (b) The person knowingly or intentionally commits an act likely to cause serious physical or mental harm to a child regardless of whether harm results. (c) The person knowingly or intentionally commits an act that is cruel to a child regardless of whether harm results. (d) The person or a licensee, as licensee is defined in section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111, violates section 15(2) of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.125. (4) Child abuse in the second degree is a felony punishable by imprisonment as follows: (a) For a first offense, not more than 10 years. (b) For an offense following a prior conviction, not more than 20 years.for life or any term of years but not less than 10 years. (5) A person is guilty of child abuse in the third degree if any of the following apply: (a) The person knowingly or intentionally causes physical harm to a child. (b) The person knowingly or intentionally commits an act that under the circumstances poses an unreasonable risk of harm or injury to a child, and the act results in physical harm to a child. (6) Child abuse in the third degree is a felony punishable by imprisonment as follows: (a) For a first offense, not more than 2 years. (b) For an offense following a prior conviction, not more than 5 years.for life or any term of years but not less than 4 years. (7) A person is guilty of child abuse in the fourth degree if any of the following apply: (a) The person's omission or reckless act causes physical harm to a child. (b) The person knowingly or intentionally commits an act that under the circumstances poses an unreasonable risk of harm or injury to a child, regardless of whether physical harm results. (8) Child abuse in the fourth degree is a crime punishable as follows: (a) For a first offense, a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year. (b) For an offense following a prior conviction, a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years. (9) This section does not prohibit a parent or guardian, or other person permitted by law or authorized by the parent or guardian, from taking steps to reasonably discipline a child, including the use of reasonable force. (10) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section that the defendant's conduct involving the child was a reasonable response to an act of domestic violence in light of all the facts and circumstances known to the defendant at that time. The defendant has the burden of establishing the affirmative defense by a preponderance of the evidence. As used in this subsection, "domestic violence" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1978 PA 389, MCL 400.1501. (11) If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek an enhanced sentence based upon the defendant having 1 or more prior convictions, the prosecuting attorney shall include on the complaint and information a statement listing the prior conviction or convictions. The existence of the defendant's prior conviction or convictions must be determined by the court, without a jury, at sentencing or at a separate hearing for that purpose before sentencing. The existence of a prior conviction may be established by any evidence relevant for that purpose, including, but not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (a) A copy of the judgment of conviction. (b) A transcript of a prior trial, plea-taking, or sentencing. (c) Information contained in a presentence report. (d) The defendant's statement. (12) As used in this section, "prior conviction" means a violation of this section or a violation of a law of another state substantially corresponding to this section. Sec. 145a. A person who accosts, entices, or solicits a child less than 16 years of age, regardless of whether the person knows the individual is a child or knows the actual age of the child, or an individual whom he or she believes is a child less than 16 years of age with the intent to induce or force that child or individual to commit an immoral act, to submit to an act of sexual intercourse or an act of gross indecency, or to any other act of depravity or delinquency, or who encourages a child less than 16 years of age, regardless of whether the person knows the individual is a child or knows the actual age of the child, or an individual whom he or she believes is a child less than 16 years of age to engage in any of those acts is guilty of a felony punishable by and the court shall sentence the person to imprisonment for not more less than 4 5 years or and may impose a fine of not more than $4,000.00, or both. Sec. 145c. (1) As used in this section: (a) "Access" means to intentionally cause to be viewed by or transmitted to a person. (b) "Appears to include a child" means that the depiction appears to include, or conveys the impression that it includes, a person who is less than 18 years of age, and the depiction meets either of the following conditions: (i) It was created using a depiction of any part of an actual person under the age of 18 years of age. (ii) It was not created using a depiction of any part of an actual person under the age of 18 years of age, but all of the following apply to that depiction: (A) The average individual, applying contemporary community standards, would find the depiction, taken as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest. (B) The reasonable person would find the depiction, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value. (C) The depiction depicts or describes a listed sexual act in a patently offensive way. (c) "Child" means a person who is less than 18 years of age, subject to the affirmative defense created in subsection (7) regarding persons emancipated by operation of law. (d) "Commercial film or photographic print processor" means a person or his or her employee who, for compensation, develops exposed photographic film into movie films, negatives, slides, or prints; makes prints from negatives or slides; or duplicates movie films or videotapes. (e) "Computer technician" means a person who installs, maintains, troubleshoots, upgrades, or repairs computer hardware, software, personal computer networks, or peripheral equipment. (f) "Contemporary community standards" means the customary limits of candor and decency in this state at or near the time of the alleged violation of this section. (g) "Erotic fondling" means touching a person's clothed or unclothed genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or, if the person is female, breasts, or if the person is a child, the developing or undeveloped breast area, for the purpose of real or simulated overt sexual gratification or stimulation of 1 or more of the persons involved. Erotic fondling does not include physical contact, even if affectionate, that is not for the purpose of real or simulated overt sexual gratification or stimulation of 1 or more of the persons involved. (h) "Erotic nudity" means the lascivious exhibition of the genital, pubic, or rectal area of any person. As used in this subdivision, "lascivious" means wanton, lewd, and lustful and tending to produce voluptuous or lewd emotions. (i) "Listed sexual act" means sexual intercourse, erotic fondling, sadomasochistic abuse, masturbation, passive sexual involvement, sexual excitement, or erotic nudity. (j) "Make" means to bring into existence by copying, shaping, changing, or combining material, and specifically includes, but is not limited to, intentionally creating a reproduction, copy, or print of child sexually abusive material, in whole or part. Make does not include the creation of an identical reproduction or copy of child sexually abusive material within the same digital storage device or the same piece of digital storage media. (k) "Masturbation" means the real or simulated touching, rubbing, or otherwise stimulating of a person's own clothed or unclothed genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or, if the person is female, breasts, or if the person is a child, the developing or undeveloped breast area, either by manual manipulation or self-induced or with an artificial instrument, for the purpose of real or simulated overt sexual gratification or arousal of the person. (l) "Passive sexual involvement" means an act, real or simulated, that exposes another person to or draws another person's attention to an act of sexual intercourse, erotic fondling, sadomasochistic abuse, masturbation, sexual excitement, or erotic nudity because of viewing any of these acts or because of the proximity of the act to that person, for the purpose of real or simulated overt sexual gratification or stimulation of 1 or more of the persons involved. (m) "Prurient interest" means a shameful or morbid interest in nudity, sex, or excretion. (n) "Child sexually abusive activity" means a child engaging in a listed sexual act. (o) "Child sexually abusive material" means any depiction, whether made or produced by electronic, mechanical, or other means, including a developed or undeveloped photograph, picture, film, slide, video, electronic visual image, computer diskette, computer or computer-generated image, or picture, or sound recording which that is of a child or appears to include a child engaging in a listed sexual act; a book, magazine, computer, computer storage device, or other visual or print or printable medium containing such a photograph, picture, film, slide, video, electronic visual image, computer, or computer-generated image, or picture, or sound recording; or any reproduction, copy, or print of such a photograph, picture, film, slide, video, electronic visual image, book, magazine, computer, or computer-generated image, or picture, other visual or print or printable medium, or sound recording. (p) "Sadomasochistic abuse" means either of the following: (i) Flagellation or torture, real or simulated, for the purpose of real or simulated sexual stimulation or gratification, by or upon a person. (ii) The condition, real or simulated, of being fettered, bound, or otherwise physically restrained for sexual stimulation or gratification of a person. (q) "Sexual excitement" means the condition, real or simulated, of human male or female genitals in a state of real or simulated overt sexual stimulation or arousal. (r) "Sexual intercourse" means intercourse, real or simulated, whether genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-anal, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex or between a human and an animal, or with an artificial genital. (2) A person who persuades, induces, entices, coerces, causes, or knowingly allows a child to engage in a child sexually abusive activity for the purpose of producing any child sexually abusive material, or a person who arranges for, produces, makes, copies, reproduces, or finances, or a person who attempts or prepares or conspires to arrange for, produce, make, copy, reproduce, or finance any child sexually abusive activity or child sexually abusive material for personal, distributional, or other purposes if that person knows, has reason to know, or should reasonably be expected to know that the child is a child or that the child sexually abusive material includes a child or that the depiction constituting the child sexually abusive material appears to include a child, or that person has not taken reasonable precautions to determine the age of the child is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 20 10 years or a fine of not more than $100,000.00, or both. (b) If the child sexually abusive activity or child sexually abusive material involves a prepubescent child, sadomasochistic abuse or bestiality, or includes a video or more than 100 images of child sexually abusive material, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 25 15 years or a fine of not more than $125,000.00, or both. (3) Except as provided in subsection (14), a person who distributes or promotes, or finances the distribution or promotion of, or receives for the purpose of distributing or promoting, or conspires, attempts, or prepares to distribute, receive, finance, or promote any child sexually abusive material or child sexually abusive activity if that person knows, has reason to know, or should reasonably be expected to know that the child is a child or that the child sexually abusive material includes a child or that the depiction constituting the child sexually abusive material appears to include a child, or that person has not taken reasonable precautions to determine the age of the child is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 7 10 years or a fine of not more than $50,000.00, or both. (b) If the child sexually abusive activity or child sexually abusive material involves a prepubescent child, sadomasochistic abuse or bestiality, or includes a video or more than 100 images of child sexually abusive material, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 15 years or a fine of not more than $75,000.00, or both. (4) A person who knowingly possesses or knowingly seeks and accesses any child sexually abusive material if that person knows, has reason to know, or should reasonably be expected to know the child is a child or that the child sexually abusive material includes a child or that the depiction constituting the child sexually abusive material appears to include a child, or that person has not taken reasonable precautions to determine the age of the child is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) and section 145g, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 4 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (b) If the child sexually abusive activity or child sexually abusive material involves a prepubescent child, sadomasochistic abuse or bestiality, or includes a video or more than 100 images of child sexually abusive material, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 12 years and 6 months or a fine of not more than $50,000.00, or both. (5) Subsection (4) does not apply to any of the following: (a) A person described in section 7 of 1984 PA 343, MCL 752.367, a commercial film or photographic print processor acting under subsection (9), or a computer technician acting under subsection (10). (b) A police officer acting within the scope of his or her duties as a police officer. (c) An employee or contract agent of the department of health and human services acting within the scope of his or her duties as an employee or contract agent. (d) A judicial officer or judicial employee acting within the scope of his or her duties as a judicial officer or judicial employee. (e) A party or witness in a criminal or civil proceeding acting within the scope of that criminal or civil proceeding. (f) A physician, psychologist, limited license psychologist, professional counselor, or registered nurse licensed under the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.1101 to 333.25211, acting within the scope of practice for which he or she is licensed. (g) A social worker registered in this state under article 15 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16101 to 333.18838, acting within the scope of practice for which he or she is registered. (6) Expert testimony as to the age of the child used in a child sexually abusive material or a child sexually abusive activity is admissible as evidence in court and may be a legitimate basis for determining age, if age is not otherwise proven. (7) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section that the alleged child is a person who is emancipated by operation of law under section 4(2) of 1968 PA 293, MCL 722.4, as proven by a preponderance of the evidence. (8) If a defendant in a prosecution under this section proposes to offer in his or her defense evidence to establish that a depiction that appears to include a child was not, in fact, created using a depiction of any part of an actual person under the age of 18 years of age, the defendant shall at the time of the arraignment on the information or within 15 days after arraignment but not less than 10 days before the trial of the case, or at such other time as the court directs, file and serve upon the prosecuting attorney of record a notice in writing of his or her intention to offer that defense. The notice must contain, as particularly as is known to the defendant or the defendant's attorney, the names of witnesses to be called on behalf of the defendant to establish that defense. The defendant's notice must include specific information as to the facts that establish that the depiction was not, in fact, created using a depiction of any part of an actual person under the age of 18 years of age. Failure to file a timely notice in conformance with this subsection precludes a defendant from offering this defense. (9) If a commercial film or photographic print processor reports to a law enforcement agency having jurisdiction his or her knowledge or observation, within the scope of his or her professional capacity or employment, of a film, photograph, movie film, videotape, negative, or slide depicting a person that the processor has reason to know or reason to believe is a child engaged in a listed sexual act; furnishes a copy of the film, photograph, movie film, videotape, negative, or slide to a law enforcement agency having jurisdiction; or keeps the film, photograph, movie film, videotape, negative, or slide according to the law enforcement agency's instructions, both of the following apply: (a) The identity of the processor must be confidential, subject to disclosure only with his or her consent or by judicial process. (b) If the processor acted in good faith, he or she is immune from civil liability that might otherwise be incurred by his or her actions. This immunity extends only to acts described in this subsection. (10) If a computer technician reports to a law enforcement agency having jurisdiction his or her knowledge or observation, within the scope of his or her professional capacity or employment, of an electronic visual image, computer-generated image or picture or sound recording depicting a person that the computer technician has reason to know or reason to believe is a child engaged in a listed sexual act; furnishes a copy of that image, picture, or sound recording to the law enforcement agency; or keeps the image, picture, or sound recording according to the law enforcement agency's instructions, both of the following apply: (a) The identity of the computer technician must be confidential, subject to disclosure only with his or her consent or by judicial process. (b) If the computer technician acted in good faith, he or she is immune from civil liability that might otherwise be incurred by his or her actions. This immunity extends only to acts described in this subsection. (11) In any criminal proceeding regarding an alleged violation or attempted violation of this section, the court shall deny any request by the defendant to copy, photograph, duplicate, or otherwise reproduce any photographic or other pictorial evidence of a child engaging in a listed sexual act if the prosecuting attorney makes that evidence reasonably available to the defendant. Evidence is considered to be reasonably available to the defendant under this subsection if the prosecuting attorney provides an opportunity to the defendant and his or her attorney, and any person the defendant may seek to qualify as an expert witness at trial, to inspect, view, and examine that evidence at a facility approved by the prosecuting attorney. (12) This section applies uniformly throughout the state and all political subdivisions and municipalities in the state. (13) A local municipality or political subdivision shall not enact any ordinance or enforce any existing ordinance, rule, or regulation governing child sexually abusive activity or child sexually abusive material. (14) Subsection (3) does not apply to the persons described in section 7 of 1984 PA 343, MCL 752.367. Sec. 159j. (1) A person who violates section 159i is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 20 10 years or a fine of not more than $100,000.00, or both. (2) In addition to any penalty imposed under subsection (1), the court may do 1 or more of the following with respect to a person convicted under section 159i: (a) Order the person to pay court costs. (b) Order the person to pay to the state or local law enforcement agency that handled the investigation and prosecution the costs of the investigation and prosecution that are reasonably incurred. (3) The court shall hold a hearing to determine the amount of court costs and other costs to be imposed under subsection (2). (4) The court shall order a person convicted of a violation of section 159i to criminally forfeit to the state any real, personal, or intangible property in which he or she has an interest and that was used in the course of, intended for use in the course of, derived from, or realized through conduct in violation of section 159i, including any property constituting an interest in, means of control over, or influence over the enterprise involved in the violation and any property constituting proceeds derived from the violation. The court's authority under this subsection also includes, but is not limited to, the authority to do any of the following: (a) Order the convicted person to divest himself or herself of any interest, direct or indirect, in the enterprise. (b) Impose reasonable restrictions on the future activities or investments of the convicted person, including prohibiting the convicted person from engaging in the same type of endeavor as the enterprise engaged in. (c) Order the dissolution or reorganization of an enterprise upon finding that, for the prevention of future criminal activity, the public interest requires the dissolution or reorganization. This subdivision does not apply to the extent that an order of dissolution or reorganization is preempted by chapter 7 of the national labor relations act, 29 USC 141 to 187. (d) Order the suspension or revocation of a license, permit, or prior approval granted to an enterprise by any agency of the state, county, or other political subdivision upon finding that, for the prevention of future criminal activity, the public interest requires the suspension or revocation. (e) Order the surrender of the charter of a corporation organized under the laws of this state or the revocation of a certificate authorizing a foreign corporation to conduct business within this state upon finding that the board of directors or a managerial agent acting on behalf of the corporation, in conducting the affairs of the corporation, authorized or engaged in racketeering and, for the prevention of future criminal activity, that the public interest requires that the charter or certificate of the corporation be surrendered or revoked. (5) A sentence ordering criminal forfeiture under this section shall not be entered unless the indictment or information alleges the extent of the property subject to forfeiture, or unless the sentence requires the forfeiture of property that was not reasonably foreseen to be subject to forfeiture at the time of the indictment or information, if the prosecuting agency gave prompt notice to the defendant of the property not reasonably foreseen to be subject to forfeiture when it was discovered to be forfeitable. (6) Reasonable attorney fees for representation in an action under this chapter are not subject to criminal forfeiture under this chapter. (7) At sentencing and following a hearing, the court shall determine the extent of the property subject to forfeiture, if any, and shall enter an order of forfeiture. The court may base its determination on evidence in the trial record. (8) If any property included in the order of forfeiture under this section cannot be located or has been sold to a bona fide purchaser for value, placed beyond the jurisdiction of the court, substantially diminished in value by the conduct of the defendant, or commingled with other property that cannot be divided without difficulty or undue injury to innocent persons, the court shall order forfeiture of any other reachable property of the defendant up to the value of the property that is unreachable. (9) All property ordered forfeited under this section shall be retained by the law enforcement agency that seized it for disposal pursuant to section 159r. (10) The seizing agency may deposit money seized under this section into an interest-bearing account in a financial institution. As used in this subsection, "financial institution" means a state or nationally chartered bank or a state or federally chartered savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union whose deposits are insured by an agency of the United States government and that maintains a principal office or branch office located in this state under the laws of this state or the United States. (11) An attorney for a person who is charged with a violation of section 159i involving or related to money seized by a law enforcement agency that is subject to criminal forfeiture under this section shall be afforded a period of 60 days within which to examine that money. This 60-day period shall begin to run after notice of forfeiture is given but before the money is deposited into a financial institution under subsection (10). If the prosecuting agency fails to sustain its burden of proof in criminal proceedings under section 159i, the court shall order the return of the money, including any interest earned on money deposited into a financial institution under subsection (10). (12) An order of criminal forfeiture entered under this section shall authorize an appropriate law enforcement agency to seize the property declared criminally forfeited under this section upon those terms and conditions relating to the time and manner of seizure the court determines proper. (13) Criminal penalties under this section are not mutually exclusive and do not preclude the application of any other criminal or civil remedy under this section or any other provision of law. Sec. 174. (1) A person who as the agent, servant, or employee of another person, governmental entity within this state, or other legal entity or who as the trustee, bailee, or custodian of the property of another person, governmental entity within this state, or other legal entity fraudulently disposes of or converts to his or her own use, or takes or secretes with the intent to convert to his or her own use without the consent of his or her principal, any money or other personal property of his or her principal that has come to that person's possession or that is under his or her charge or control by virtue of his or her being an agent, servant, employee, trustee, bailee, or custodian, is guilty of embezzlement. (2) If the money or other personal property embezzled has a value of less than $200.00, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $500.00 or 3 times the value of the money or property embezzled, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (3) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the value of the money or other property embezzled, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The money or other personal property embezzled has a value of $200.00 or more but less than $1,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (2) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to this section. (c) The person violates subsection (2) and the victim is a nonprofit corporation or charitable organization under federal law or the laws of this state. (4) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 years 1 year or a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times the value of the money or other property embezzled, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The money or other personal property embezzled has a value of $1,000.00 or more but less than $20,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (3)(a) or (c) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (2) or (3)(b). (c) The person violates subsection (3)(a) and the victim is a nonprofit corporation or charitable organization under federal law or the laws of this state. (5) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00 or 3 times the value of the money or other property embezzled, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The money or other personal property embezzled has a value of $20,000.00 or more but less than $50,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (4)(a) or (c) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (2) or (3)(b). (c) The person violates subsection (4)(a) and the victim is a nonprofit corporation or charitable organization under federal law or the laws of this state. (6) If the money or other personal property embezzled has a value of $50,000.00 or more but less than $100,000.00, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more than 15 less than 7 years and 6 months or a fine of not more than $25,000.00 or 3 times the value of the money or property embezzled, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (7) If the money or other personal property embezzled has a value of $100,000.00 or more, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more than 20 less than 10 years or a fine of not more than $50,000.00 or 3 times the value of the money or property embezzled, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (8) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the values of money or other personal property embezzled in separate incidents pursuant to a scheme or course of conduct within any 12-month period may be aggregated to determine the total value of money or personal property embezzled. If the scheme or course of conduct is directed against only 1 person, governmental entity within this state, or other legal entity, no time limit applies to aggregation under this subsection. (9) If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek an enhanced sentence based upon the defendant having 1 or more prior convictions, the prosecuting attorney shall include on the complaint and information a statement listing the prior conviction or convictions. The existence of the defendant's prior conviction or convictions must be determined by the court, without a jury, at sentencing or at a separate hearing for that purpose before sentencing. The existence of a prior conviction may be established by any evidence relevant for that purpose, including, but not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (a) A copy of the judgment of conviction. (b) A transcript of a prior trial, plea-taking, or sentencing. (c) Information contained in a presentence report. (d) The defendant's statement. (10) In a prosecution under this section, the failure, neglect, or refusal of the agent, servant, employee, trustee, bailee, or custodian to pay, deliver, or refund to his or her principal the money or property entrusted to his or her care upon demand is prima facie proof of intent to embezzle. (11) If the sentence for a conviction under this section is enhanced by 1 or more prior convictions, those prior convictions must not be used to further enhance the sentence for the conviction under section 10, 11, or 12 of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.10, 769.11, and 769.12. (12) The court may order a term of imprisonment imposed for a felony violation of this section to be served consecutively to any term of imprisonment imposed for any other criminal offense if the victim of the violation of this section was any of the following: (a) A nonprofit corporation or charitable organization under federal law or the laws of this state. (b) A person 60 years of age or older. (c) A vulnerable adult as defined in section 174a. (13) As used in this section: (a) "Cryptocurrency" means digital currency in which encryption techniques are used to regulate the generation of units of currency and verify the transfer of funds, and that operates independently of a central bank. (b) "Money or other personal property" includes cryptocurrency. Sec. 174a. (1) A person shall not through fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, coercion, or unjust enrichment obtain or use or attempt to obtain or use a vulnerable adult's money or property to directly or indirectly benefit that person knowing or having reason to know the vulnerable adult is a vulnerable adult. (2) If the money or property used or obtained, or attempted to be used or obtained, has a value of less than $200.00, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $500.00 or 3 times the value of the money or property used or obtained or attempted to be used or obtained, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (3) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the value of the money or property used or obtained or attempted to be used or obtained, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The money or property used or obtained, or attempted to be used or obtained, has a value of $200.00 or more but less than $1,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (2) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. (4) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times the value of the money or property used or obtained or attempted to be used or obtained, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The money or property used or obtained, or attempted to be used or obtained, has a value of $1,000.00 or more but less than $20,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (3)(a) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (2) or (3)(b). (5) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00 or 3 times the value of the money or property used or obtained or attempted to be used or obtained, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The money or property used or obtained, or attempted to be used or obtained, has a value of $20,000.00 or more but less than $50,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (4)(a) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (2) or (3)(b). (6) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 15 5 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00 or 3 times the value of the money or property used or obtained or attempted to be used or obtained, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The money or property used or obtained, or attempted to be used or obtained, has a value of $50,000.00 or more but less than $100,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (5)(a) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (2) or (3)(b). (7) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $50,000.00 or 3 times the value of the money or property used or obtained or attempted to be used or obtained, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The money or property used or obtained, or attempted to be used or obtained, has a value of $100,000.00 or more. (b) The person violates subsection (6)(a) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (2) or (3)(b). (8) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the values of money or property used or obtained or attempted to be used or obtained in separate incidents pursuant to a scheme or course of conduct within any 12-month period may be aggregated to determine the total value of money or personal property used or obtained or attempted to be used or obtained. If the scheme or course of conduct is directed against only 1 person, no time limit applies to aggregation under this subsection. (9) If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek an enhanced sentence based upon the defendant having 1 or more prior convictions, the prosecuting attorney shall include on the complaint and information a statement listing the prior conviction or convictions. The existence of the defendant's prior conviction or convictions shall be determined by the court, without a jury, at sentencing or at a separate hearing for that purpose before sentencing. The existence of a prior conviction may be established by any evidence relevant for that purpose, including, but not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (a) A copy of the judgment of conviction. (b) A transcript of a prior trial, plea-taking, or sentencing. (c) Information contained in a presentence report. (d) The defendant's statement. (10) If the sentence for a conviction under this section is enhanced by 1 or more prior convictions, those prior convictions shall not be used to further enhance the sentence for the conviction under section 10, 11, or 12 of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.10, 769.11, and 769.12. (11) A financial institution or a broker or a director, officer, employee, or agent of a financial institution or broker is not in violation of this section while performing duties in the normal course of business of a financial institution or broker or a director, officer, employee, or agent of a financial institution or broker. (12) (13) The court may order a sentence imposed for a violation of subsection (4), (5), (6), or (7) to be served consecutively to any other sentence imposed for a violation of this section. (13) (14) This section does not prohibit a person from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law the person commits while violating this section. (14) (15) As used in this section: (a) "Broker" means that term as defined in section 8102 of the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.8102. (b) "Financial institution" means a bank, credit union, saving bank, or a savings and loan chartered under state or federal law or an affiliate of a bank, credit union, saving bank, or savings and loan chartered under state or federal law. (c) "Vulnerable adult" means that term as defined in section 145m, whether or not the individual has been determined by the court to be incapacitated. (15) (16) If the office of services to the aging becomes aware of a violation of this section, the office of services to the aging shall promptly report the violation to the department of human services. Sec. 193. (1) A person imprisoned in a prison of this state who breaks prison and escapes, breaks prison though an escape is not actually made, escapes, leaves the prison without being discharged by due process of law, attempts to break prison, or attempts to escape from prison, is guilty of a felony. , punishable by The court shall sentence the person to further imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more than 5 years. less than 1/4 of the original sentence to be served as provided in this subsection. The term of the further imprisonment shall be served after the termination, pursuant to law, of the sentence or sentences then being served. A prisoner who breaks prison, escapes, attempts to break prison, or attempts to escape, shall be charged with that offense and tried in the courts of the county in which the prison or penal facility to which the prisoner was committed or transferred is located at the time of the breaking, escape, or attempt to break or escape. (2) As used in this section, "prison" means a facility that houses prisoners committed to the jurisdiction of the department of corrections and includes the grounds, farm, shop, road camp, or place of employment operated by the facility or under control of the officers of the facility, the department of corrections, a police officer of this state, or any other person authorized by the department of corrections to have a prisoner under care, custody, or supervision, either in a facility or outside a facility, whether for the purpose of work, medical care, or any other reason. (3) A person who escapes from the lawful custody of a guard, prison official, or an employee while outside the confines of a prison is guilty of a violation of this section. A person, admitted to a facility of the department of mental health from a prison pursuant to sections 1001 to 1006 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.2001 to 330.2006, who escapes from the mental health facility is guilty of a violation of this section. A person released from prison under a work pass program who violates the terms of the release or fails to return to the place of imprisonment within the time provided is guilty of a violation of this section. A person violating the conditions of a parole is not an escapee under this act. Sec. 195. (1) A person lawfully imprisoned in a jail for a term imposed for a misdemeanor who breaks jail and escapes, breaks jail though an escape is not actually made, escapes, leaves the jail without being discharged from the jail by due process of law, or attempts to escape from the jail, is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years, or by a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (2) A person lawfully imprisoned in a jail for a term imposed for a felony who breaks jail and escapes, breaks jail though an escape is not actually made, escapes, leaves the jail without being discharged from the jail by due process of law, or attempts to escape from the jail, is guilty of a felony. A person who violates this subsection shall be imprisoned for the unexpired portion of the term of imprisonment the person was serving at the time of the violation, and any The court shall sentence the person to further imprisonment for life or any term of years but not less than 1/4 of the original sentence to be served as provided in this subsection. A term of imprisonment imposed for the violation of this subsection shall begin begins to run at the expiration of that prior term of imprisonment. (3) This section does not apply to a person who left the jail pursuant to a day parole granted for any purpose under section 1 of Act No. 60 of the Public Acts of 1962, being section 801.251 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, 1962 PA 60, MCL 801.251, and who is absent from the jail after the time he or she was required to return to the jail unless the person has the intent to escape from imprisonment. (4) As used in this section, "jail" means a facility that is operated by a local unit of government for the detention of persons charged with, or convicted of, criminal offenses or ordinance violations, or persons found guilty of civil or criminal contempt. Sec. 197c. (1) A person lawfully imprisoned in a jail, other place of confinement established by law for any term, or lawfully imprisoned for any purpose at any other place, including, but not limited to, hospitals and other health care facilities or awaiting examination, trial, arraignment, sentence, or after sentence awaiting or during transfer to or from a prison, for a crime or offense, or charged with a crime or offense who, without being discharged from the place of confinement, or other lawful imprisonment by due process of law, through the use of violence, threats of violence or dangerous weapons, assaults an employee of the place of confinement or other custodian knowing the person to be an employee or custodian or breaks the place of confinement and escapes, or breaks the place of confinement although an escape is not actually made, is guilty of a felony punishable by and the court shall sentence the person to further imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more than 5 years less than 1/2 of the original sentence or a fine of not more than $2,500.00, or both. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Place of confinement" includes a correctional facility operated by the department of corrections, a local unit of government, or a private vendor under section 20i of 1953 PA 232, MCL 791.220i. (b) "Employee" includes persons who are employed by the place of confinement as independent contractors. Sec. 207. (1) A person shall not place an explosive substance in or near any real or personal property with the intent to frighten, terrorize, intimidate, threaten, harass, injure, or kill any person, or with the intent to damage or destroy any real or personal property without the permission of the property owner or, if the property is public property, without the permission of the governmental agency having authority over that property. (2) A person who violates this section is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) to (e), the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 15 5 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (b) If the violation damages the property of another person, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00, or both. (c) If the violation causes physical injury to another individual, other than serious impairment of a body function, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 25 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (d) If the violation causes serious impairment of a body function to another individual, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or for any term of years or a fine of not more than $25,000.00, or both. (e) Except as provided in sections 25 and 25a of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.25 and 769.25a, if the violation causes the death of another individual, the person is guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned for life without eligibility for parole and may be fined not more than $40,000.00, or both. Sec. 213. Malicious threats to extort moneyï¿½Any A person who, shall, either orally or by a written or printed communication, maliciously threaten threatens to accuse another of any crime or offense, or shall who orally or by any written or printed communication maliciously threaten threatens any injury to the person or property or mother, father, husband, wife, or child of another with the intent thereby to extort money or any pecuniary advantage whatever, or with intent to compel the person so threatened to do or refrain from doing any act against his the person's will, shall be is guilty of a felony , punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for life or any term of years but not less than 5 more than 20 years or by a fine of not more than 10,000 dollars.$10,000.00. Sec. 218. (1) A person who, with the intent to defraud or cheat makes or uses a false pretense to do 1 or more of the following is guilty of a crime punishable as provided in this section: (a) Cause a person to grant, convey, assign, demise, lease, or mortgage land or an interest in land. (b) Obtain a person's signature on a forged written instrument. (c) Obtain from a person any money or personal property or the use of any instrument, facility, article, or other valuable thing or service. (d) By means of a false weight or measure obtain a larger amount or quantity of property than was bargained for. (e) By means of a false weight or measure sell or dispose of a smaller amount or quantity of property than was bargained for. (2) If the land, interest in land, money, personal property, use of the instrument, facility, article, or valuable thing, service, larger amount obtained, or smaller amount sold or disposed of has a value of less than $200.00, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $500.00 or 3 times the value, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (3) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the value, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The land, interest in land, money, personal property, use of the instrument, facility, article, or valuable thing, service, larger amount obtained, or smaller amount sold or disposed of has a value of $200.00 or more but less than $1,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (2) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to this section. (4) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 2 years and 6 months or a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times the value, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The land, interest in land, money, personal property, use of the instrument, facility, article, or valuable thing, service, larger amount obtained, or smaller amount sold or disposed of has a value of $1,000.00 or more but less than $20,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (3)(a) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (2) or (3)(b). (5) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 15 5 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00 or 3 times the value, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The land, interest in land, money, personal property, use of the instrument, facility, article, or valuable thing, service, larger amount obtained, or smaller amount sold or disposed of has a value of $20,000.00 or more but less than $50,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (4)(a) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (2) or (3)(b). (6) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 15 10 years or a fine of not more than $25,000.00 or 3 times the value, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The land, interest in land, money, personal property, use of the instrument, facility, article, or valuable thing, service, larger amount obtained, or smaller amount sold or disposed of has a value of $50,000.00 or more but less than $100,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (5)(a) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (2) or (3)(b). (7) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 20 15 years or a fine of not more than $35,000.00 or 3 times the value, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The land, interest in land, money, personal property, use of the instrument, facility, article, or valuable thing, service, larger amount obtained, or smaller amount sold or disposed of has a value of $100,000.00 or more. (b) The person violates subsection (6)(a) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (2) or (3)(b). (8) The values of land, interest in land, money, personal property, use of the instrument, facility, article, or valuable thing, service, larger amount obtained, or smaller amount sold or disposed of in separate incidents pursuant to a scheme or course of conduct within any 12-month period may be aggregated to determine the total value involved in the violation of this section. (9) If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek an enhanced sentence based upon the defendant having 1 or more prior convictions, the prosecuting attorney shall include on the complaint and information a statement listing the prior conviction or convictions. The existence of the defendant's prior conviction or convictions shall be determined by the court, without a jury, at sentencing or at a separate hearing for that purpose before sentencing. The existence of a prior conviction may be established by any evidence relevant for that purpose, including, but not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (a) A copy of the judgment of conviction. (b) A transcript of a prior trial, plea-taking, or sentencing. (c) Information contained in a presentence report. (d) The defendant's statement. (10) If the sentence for a conviction under this section is enhanced by 1 or more prior convictions, those prior convictions shall not be used to further enhance the sentence for the conviction under section 10, 11, or 12 of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.10, 769.11, and 769.12. (11) As used in this section, "false pretense" includes, but is not limited to, a false or fraudulent representation, writing, communication, statement, or message, communicated by any means to another person, that the maker of the representation, writing, communication, statement, or message knows is false or fraudulent. The false pretense may be a representation regarding a past or existing fact or circumstance or a representation regarding the intention to perform a future event or to have a future event performed. Sec. 224f. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), a person convicted of a felony shall not possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm in this state until the expiration of 3 years after all of the following circumstances exist: (a) The person has paid all fines imposed for the violation. (b) The person has served all terms of imprisonment imposed for the violation. (c) The person has successfully completed all conditions of probation or parole imposed for the violation. (2) A person convicted of a specified felony shall not possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm in this state until all of the following circumstances exist: (a) The expiration of 5 years after all of the following circumstances exist: (i) The person has paid all fines imposed for the violation. (ii) The person has served all terms of imprisonment imposed for the violation. (iii) The person has successfully completed all conditions of probation or parole imposed for the violation. (b) The person's right to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm has been restored under section 4 of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.424. (3) Except as provided in subsection (4), a person convicted of a felony shall not possess, use, transport, sell, carry, ship, or distribute ammunition in this state until the expiration of 3 years after all of the following circumstances exist: (a) The person has paid all fines imposed for the violation. (b) The person has served all terms of imprisonment imposed for the violation. (c) The person has successfully completed all conditions of probation or parole imposed for the violation. (4) A person convicted of a specified felony shall not possess, use, transport, sell, carry, ship, or distribute ammunition in this state until all of the following circumstances exist: (a) The expiration of 5 years after all of the following circumstances exist: (i) The person has paid all fines imposed for the violation. (ii) The person has served all terms of imprisonment imposed for the violation. (iii) The person has successfully completed all conditions of probation or parole imposed for the violation. (b) The person's right to possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute ammunition has been restored under section 4 of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.424. (5) A person convicted of a misdemeanor involving domestic violence shall not possess, use, transport, sell, purchase, carry, ship, receive, or distribute a firearm or ammunition in this state until the expiration of 8 years after all of the following circumstances exist: (a) The person has paid all fines imposed for the violation. (b) The person has served all terms of imprisonment imposed for the violation. (c) The person has successfully completed all conditions of probation imposed for the violation. (6) A person who possesses, uses, transports, sells, purchases, carries, ships, receives, or distributes a firearm in violation of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 10 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (7) A person who possesses, uses, transports, sells, carries, ships, or distributes ammunition in violation of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (8) Any single criminal transaction where a person possesses, uses, transports, sells, carries, ships, or distributes ammunition in violation of this section, regardless of the amount of ammunition involved, constitutes 1 offense. (9) This section does not apply to a conviction that has been expunged or set aside, or for which the person has been pardoned, unless the expunction, order, or pardon expressly provides that the person shall not possess a firearm or ammunition. (10) As used in this section: (a) "Ammunition" means any projectile that, in its current state, may be expelled from a firearm by an explosive. (b) "Felony" means a violation of a law of this state, or of another state, or of the United States that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding 1 year, or an attempt to violate such a law. (c) "Misdemeanor involving domestic violence" means a violation of any of the following: (i) Section 81(2). (ii) Section 81(4) if both the violation of section 81(4) and the previous conviction were for assaulting or assaulting and battering an individual described in section 81(2). (iii) Section 81a(2). (iv) Section 115(2). (v) Section 145n(5). (vi) Section 377a(1)(d) or (f). (vii) Section 380(5) or (7). (viii)Section 411h(2)(c). (ix) Section 540e(1)(h). (x) An ordinance, a law of another state, or a law of the United States that substantially corresponds to a violation listed in subparagraphs (i) to (ix). (xi) An ordinance, a law of another state, or a law of the United States that is specifically designated as domestic violence. (d) "Specified felony" means a felony in which 1 or more of the following circumstances exist: (i) An element of that felony is the use, attempted use, or threatened use of physical force against the person or property of another, or that by its nature involves a substantial risk that physical force against the person or property of another may be used in the course of committing the offense. (ii) An element of that felony is the unlawful manufacture, possession, importation, exportation, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled substance. (iii) An element of that felony is the unlawful possession or distribution of a firearm. (iv) An element of that felony is the unlawful use of an explosive. (v) The felony is burglary of an occupied dwelling, breaking and entering an occupied dwelling, or arson. Sec. 227b. (1) A person who carries or has in his or her possession a firearm when he or she commits or attempts to commit a felony, except a violation of section 223, 227, 227a, or 230, is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for 2 life or any term of years but not less than 5 years. Upon a second conviction under this subsection, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for 5 life or any term of years but not less than 10 years. Upon a third or subsequent conviction under this subsection, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for 10 life or any term of years but not less than 15 years. (2) A person who carries or has in his or her possession a pneumatic gun and uses that pneumatic gun in furtherance of committing or attempting to commit a felony, except a violation of section 223, 227, 227a, or 230, is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for 2 life or any term of years but not less than 5 years. Upon a second conviction under this subsection, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for 5 life or any term of years but not less than 10 years. Upon a third or subsequent conviction under this subsection, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for 10 life or any term of years but not less than 15 years. (3) A term of imprisonment prescribed by this section is in addition to the sentence imposed for the conviction of the felony or the attempt to commit the felony and shall be served consecutively with and preceding any term of imprisonment imposed for the conviction of the felony or attempt to commit the felony. (4) A term of imprisonment imposed under this section shall not be suspended. The person subject to the sentence mandated by this section is not eligible for parole or probation during the mandatory term imposed under subsection (1) or (2). (5) This section does not apply to a law enforcement officer who is authorized to carry a firearm while in the official performance of his or her duties and who is in the performance of those duties. As used in this subsection, "law enforcement officer" means a person who is regularly employed as a member of a duly authorized police agency or other organization of the United States, this state, or a city, county, township, or village of this state and who is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the general criminal laws of this state. Sec. 234a. (1) An individual who intentionally discharges a firearm from a motor vehicle, a snowmobile, or an off-road vehicle is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) If the violation endangers the safety of another individual, the individual is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more than 10 less than 5 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (b) If the violation causes any physical injury to another individual, the individual is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00, or both. (c) If the violation causes the serious impairment of a body function of another individual, the individual is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $25,000.00, or both. (d) If the violation causes the death of another individual, the individual is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to any of the following: (a) A peace officer of this state or another state, or of a local unit of government of this state or another state, or of the United States, performing his or her duties as a peace officer while on or off a scheduled work shift as a peace officer. (b) An individual who discharges a firearm in self-defense or the defense of another individual. (3) This section does not prohibit an individual from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law that is committed by that individual while violating this section. (4) A term of imprisonment imposed for a violation of this section may run consecutively to any term of imprisonment imposed for another violation arising from the same transaction. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Peace officer" means that term as defined in section 215. (b) "Serious impairment of a body function" means that term as defined in section 58c of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.58c. Sec. 317. Second degree murderï¿½All other kinds of murder shall be not described under section 316 are murder of the second degree. , and shall be punished by The court shall sentence a person guilty of second degree murder to imprisonment in the state prison for ï¿½life , or any term of years , in the discretion of the court trying the same.but not less than 20 years. Sec. 317a. A person who delivers a schedule 1 or 2 controlled substance, other than marihuana, to another person in violation of section 7401 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7401, that is consumed by that person or any other person and that causes the death of that person or other person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not less than 15 years. Sec. 321. Manslaughterï¿½Any A person who shall commit commits the crime of manslaughter shall be is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the state prison, for life or any term of years but not more than 15 less than 5 years or by a fine of not more than 7,500 dollars, $7,500.00, or both. , at the discretion of the court. Sec. 349. (1) A person commits the crime of kidnapping if he or she the person knowingly restrains another person with the intent to do 1 or more of the following: (a) Hold that person for ransom or reward. (b) Use that person as a shield or hostage. (c) Engage in criminal sexual penetration or criminal sexual contact prohibited under chapter LXXVI with that person. (d) Take that person outside of this state. (e) Hold that person in involuntary servitude. (f) Engage in child sexually abusive activity, as that term is defined in section 145c, with that person, if that person is a minor. (2) As used in this section, "restrain" means to restrict a person's movements or to confine the person so as to interfere with that person's liberty without that person's consent or without legal authority. The restraint does not have to exist for any particular length of time and may be related or incidental to the commission of other criminal acts. (3) A person who commits the crime of kidnapping is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not less than 15 years or a fine of not more than $50,000.00, or both. (4) This section does not prohibit the person from being charged with, convicted of, or sentenced for any other violation of law arising from the same transaction as the violation of this section. Sec. 349b. (1) A person commits the crime of unlawful imprisonment if he or she the person knowingly restrains another person under any of the following circumstances: (a) The person is restrained by means of a weapon or dangerous instrument. (b) The restrained person was secretly confined. (c) The person was restrained to facilitate the commission of another felony or to facilitate flight after commission of another felony. (2) A person who commits unlawful imprisonment is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 15 10 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Restrain" means to forcibly restrict a person's movements or to forcibly confine the person so as to interfere with that person's liberty without that person's consent or without lawful authority. The restraint does not have to exist for any particular length of time and may be related or incidental to the commission of other criminal acts. (b) "Secretly confined" means either of the following: (i) To keep the confinement of the restrained person a secret. (ii) To keep the location of the restrained person a secret. (4) This section does not prohibit the person from being charged with, convicted of, or sentenced for any other violation of law that is committed by that person while violating this section. Sec. 356. (1) A person who commits larceny by stealing any of the following property of another person is guilty of a crime as provided in this section: (a) Money, goods, or chattels. (b) A bank note, bank bill, bond, promissory note, due bill, bill of exchange or other bill, draft, order, or certificate. (c) A book of accounts for or concerning money or goods due, to become due, or to be delivered. (d) A deed or writing containing a conveyance of land or other valuable contract in force. (e) A receipt, release, or defeasance. (f) A writ, process, or public record. (g) Scrap metal. (2) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 5 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00 or 3 times the value of the property stolen, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The property stolen has a value of $20,000.00 or more. (b) The person violates subsection (3)(a) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (4)(b) or (5). (3) If any of the following apply, the property stolen has a value of $1,000.00 or more but less than $20,000.00, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 4 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times the value of the property stolen, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. : (a) The property stolen has a value of $1,000.00 or more but less than $20,000.00. (4) (b) The If the person violates subsection (4)(a) (5)(a) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not less than 3 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times the value of the property stolen, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. For purposes of this subdivision, subsection, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (4)(b) (5)(b) or (5).(6). (5) (4) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the value of the property stolen, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The property stolen has a value of $200.00 or more but less than $1,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (5) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to this section. (6) (5) If the property stolen has a value of less than $200.00, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $500.00 or 3 times the value of the property stolen, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (7) (6) If the property stolen is scrap metal, then, as used in this section, "the value of the property stolen" means the greatest of the following: (a) The replacement cost of the stolen scrap metal. (b) The cost of repairing the damage caused by the larceny of the scrap metal. (c) The sum of subdivisions (a) and (b). (8) (7) The values of property stolen in separate incidents pursuant to a scheme or course of conduct within any 12-month period may be aggregated to determine the total value of property stolen. (9) (8) If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek an enhanced sentence based upon the defendant having 1 or more prior convictions, the prosecuting attorney shall include on the complaint and information a statement listing the prior conviction or convictions. The existence of the defendant's prior conviction or convictions shall be determined by the court, without a jury, at sentencing or at a separate hearing for that purpose before sentencing. The existence of a prior conviction may be established by any evidence relevant for that purpose, including, but not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (a) A copy of the judgment of conviction. (b) A transcript of a prior trial, plea-taking, or sentencing. (c) Information contained in a presentence report. (d) The defendant's statement. (10) (9) If the sentence for a conviction under this section is enhanced by 1 or more prior convictions, those prior convictions shall not be used to further enhance the sentence for the conviction pursuant to section 10, 11, or 12 of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.10, 769.11, and 769.12. (11) (10) As used in this section, "scrap metal" means that term as defined in section 3 of the scrap metal regulatory act, 2008 PA 429, MCL 445.423. Sec. 356a. (1) A person who commits larceny by stealing or unlawfully removing or taking any wheel, tire, air bag, catalytic converter, radio, stereo, clock, telephone, computer, or other electronic device in or on any motor vehicle, house trailer, trailer, or semitrailer is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (2) Except as provided in subsection (3), a person who enters or breaks into a motor vehicle, house trailer, trailer, or semitrailer to steal or unlawfully remove property from it is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) If the value of the property is less than $200.00, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $500.00 or 3 times the value of the property, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (b) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the value of the property, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (i) The value of the property is $200.00 or more but less than $1,000.00. (ii) The person violates subdivision (a) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to this section. (c) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more than 5 less than 3 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times the value of the property, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (i) The value of the property is $1,000.00 or more but less than $20,000.00. (ii) The person violates subdivision (b)(i) and has 1 or more prior convictions for violating or attempting to violate this section. For purposes of this subparagraph, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subdivision (a) or (b)(ii). (d) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00 or 3 times the value of the property, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (i) The property has a value of $20,000.00 or more. (ii) The person violates subdivision (c)(i) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subparagraph, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subdivision (a) or (b)(ii). (3) A person who violates subsection (2)(a) or (b) and who breaks, tears, cuts, or otherwise damages any part of the motor vehicle, house trailer, trailer, or semitrailer is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more than 5 less than 4 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both, regardless of the value of the property. (4) The values of property stolen or unlawfully removed in separate incidents pursuant to a scheme or course of conduct within any 12-month period may be aggregated to determine the total value of property stolen or unlawfully removed. (5) If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek an enhanced sentence based upon the defendant having 1 or more prior convictions, the prosecuting attorney shall include on the complaint and information a statement listing the prior conviction or convictions. The existence of the defendant's prior conviction or convictions shall be determined by the court, without a jury, at sentencing or at a separate hearing for that purpose before sentencing. The existence of a prior conviction may be established by any evidence relevant for that purpose, including, but not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (a) A copy of the judgment of conviction. (b) A transcript of a prior trial, plea-taking, or sentencing. (c) Information contained in a presentence report. (d) The defendant's statement. (e) A copy of a court register of actions. (6) If the sentence for a conviction under this section is enhanced by 1 or more prior convictions, those prior convictions shall not be used to further enhance the sentence for the conviction under section 10, 11, or 12 of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.10, 769.11, and 769.12. Sec. 356c. (1) A person who does any of the following in a store or in its immediate vicinity is guilty of retail fraud in the first degree, a felony, punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times the value of the difference in price, property stolen, or money or property obtained or attempted to be obtained, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) While a store is open to the public, alters, transfers, removes and replaces, conceals, or otherwise misrepresents the price at which property is offered for sale, with the intent not to pay for the property or to pay less than the price at which the property is offered for sale, if the resulting difference in price is $1,000.00 or more. (b) While a store is open to the public, steals property of the store that is offered for sale at a price of $1,000.00 or more. (c) With intent to defraud, obtains or attempts to obtain money or property from the store as a refund or exchange for property that was not paid for and belongs to the store, if the amount of money or the value of the property obtained or attempted to be obtained is $1,000.00 or more. (2) A person who violates section 356d(1) and who has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section or section 218, 356, 356d(1), or 360 is guilty of retail fraud in the first degree. For purposes of this subsection, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of section 218(2) or (3)(b) or section 356(4)(b) or (5). (3) The values of the difference in price, property stolen, or money or property obtained or attempted to be obtained in separate incidents pursuant to a scheme or course of conduct within any 12-month period may be aggregated to determine the total value involved in the offense under this section. (4) If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek an enhanced sentence based upon the defendant having 1 or more prior convictions, the prosecuting attorney shall include on the complaint and information a statement listing the prior conviction or convictions. The existence of the defendant's prior conviction or convictions shall be determined by the court, without a jury, at sentencing or at a separate hearing for that purpose before sentencing. The existence of a prior conviction may be established by any evidence relevant for that purpose, including, but not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (a) A copy of the judgment of conviction. (b) A transcript of a prior trial, plea-taking, or sentencing. (c) Information contained in a presentence report. (d) The defendant's statement. (5) A person who commits retail fraud in the first degree shall not be prosecuted under section 218(5) or 356(2). (6) If the sentence for a conviction under this section is enhanced by 1 or more prior convictions, those prior convictions shall not be used to further enhance the sentence for the conviction pursuant to section 10, 11, or 12 of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.10, 769.11, and 769.12. Sec. 356d. (1) A person who does any of the following in a store or in its immediate vicinity is guilty of retail fraud in the second degree, a misdemeanor felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more than 1 year less than 182 days or a fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the value of the difference in price, property stolen, or money or property obtained or attempted to be obtained, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) While a store is open to the public, alters, transfers, removes and replaces, conceals, or otherwise misrepresents the price at which property is offered for sale with the intent not to pay for the property or to pay less than the price at which the property is offered for sale if the resulting difference in price is $200.00 or more but less than $1,000.00. (b) While a store is open to the public, steals property of the store that is offered for sale at a price of $200.00 or more but less than $1,000.00. (c) With intent to defraud, obtains or attempts to obtain money or property from the store as a refund or exchange for property that was not paid for and belongs to the store if the amount of money or the value of the property obtained or attempted to be obtained is $200.00 or more but less than $1,000.00. (2) A person who violates subsection (4) and who has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section, section 218, 356, 356c, or 360, or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to this section or section 218, 356, 356c, or 360 is guilty of retail fraud in the second degree. (3) A person who commits retail fraud in the second degree shall not be prosecuted under section 360. (4) A person who does any of the following in a store or in its immediate vicinity is guilty of retail fraud in the third degree, a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $500.00 or 3 times the value of the difference in price, property stolen, or money or property obtained or attempted to be obtained, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) While a store is open to the public, alters, transfers, removes and replaces, conceals, or otherwise misrepresents the price at which property is offered for sale, with the intent not to pay for the property or to pay less than the price at which the property is offered for sale, if the resulting difference in price is less than $200.00. (b) While a store is open to the public, steals property of the store that is offered for sale at a price of less than $200.00. (c) With intent to defraud, obtains or attempts to obtain money or property from the store as a refund or exchange for property that was not paid for and belongs to the store, if the amount of money, or the value of the property, obtained or attempted to be obtained is less than $200.00. (5) A person who commits retail fraud in the third degree shall not be prosecuted under section 360. (6) The values of the difference in price, property stolen, or money or property obtained or attempted to be obtained in separate incidents pursuant to a scheme or course of conduct within any 12-month period may be aggregated to determine the total value involved in the offense under this section. (7) If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek an enhanced sentence based upon the defendant having 1 or more prior convictions, the prosecuting attorney shall include on the complaint and information a statement listing the prior conviction or convictions. The existence of the defendant's prior conviction or convictions shall be determined by the court, without a jury, at sentencing or at a separate hearing for that purpose before sentencing. The existence of a prior conviction may be established by any evidence relevant for that purpose, including, but not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (a) A copy of the judgment of conviction. (b) A transcript of a prior trial, plea-taking, or sentencing. (c) Information contained in a presentence report. (d) The defendant's statement. Sec. 357. Larceny from the personï¿½Any A person who shall commit commits the offense of larceny by stealing from the person of another shall be is guilty of a felony , punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for life or any term of years but not more than 10 less than 5 years. Sec. 357b. A person who commits larceny by stealing the firearm of another person is guilty of a felony , punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 years or by a fine of not more than $2,500.00, or both. Sec. 360. Any A person who shall commit commits the crime of larceny by stealing in any dwelling house, house trailer, office, store, gasoline service station, shop, warehouse, mill, factory, hotel, school, barn, granary, ship, boat, vessel, church, house of worship, locker room, or any building used by the public shall be is guilty of a felony. The court shall sentence the person to imprisonment for life or any term of years but not less than 5 years. Sec. 362. Larceny by conversion, etc.ï¿½Any A person to whom any money, goods, or other property, which may be the subject of larceny, shall have has been delivered, who shall embezzle embezzles or fraudulently convert converts to his the person's own use, or shall secrete secretes with the intent to embezzle, or fraudulently use such the goods, money, or other property, or any part thereof, shall be deemed by so doing to have has committed the crime of larceny and shall be punished as provided in the first section of this chapter.is guilty of a felony. The court shall sentence the person to imprisonment for life or any term of years but not less than 5 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times the value of the property stolen, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. Sec. 377a. (1) A person who willfully and maliciously destroys or injures the personal property of another person is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 5 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00 or 3 times the amount of the destruction or injury, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (i) The amount of the destruction or injury is $20,000.00 or more. (ii) The person violates subdivision (b)(i) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subparagraph, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subdivision (c)(ii), (e), or (f). (b) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 4 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times the amount of the destruction or injury, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (i) The amount of the destruction or injury is $1,000.00 or more but less than $20,000.00. (ii) The person violates subdivision (c)(i) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subparagraph, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subdivision (c)(ii), (e), or (f). (c) If any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the amount of the destruction or injury, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (i) The amount of the destruction or injury is $200.00 or more but less than $1,000.00. (ii) The person violates subdivision (e) or (f) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to this section. (d) If the person and the property owner are spouses or former spouses, have or have had a dating relationship, have or have had a child in common, or are residents or former residents of the same household, and any of the following apply, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the amount of the destruction or injury, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (i) The amount of the destruction or injury is $200.00 or more but less than $1,000.00. (ii) The person violates subdivision (e) or (f) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to this section. (e) If the amount of the destruction or injury is less than $200.00, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $500.00 or 3 times the amount of the destruction or injury, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (f) If the person and the property owner are spouses or former spouses, have or have had a dating relationship, have or have had a child in common, or are residents or former residents of the same household and the amount of the destruction or injury is less than $200.00, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $500.00 or 3 times the amount of the destruction or injury, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (2) The amounts of destruction or injury in separate incidents pursuant to a scheme or course of conduct within any 12-month period may be aggregated in determining the total amount of the destruction or injury. (3) If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek an enhanced sentence based upon the defendant having 1 or more prior convictions, the prosecuting attorney shall include on the complaint and information a statement listing the prior conviction or convictions. The existence of the defendant's prior conviction or convictions must be determined by the court, without a jury, at sentencing or at a separate hearing for that purpose before sentencing. The existence of a prior conviction may be established by any evidence relevant for that purpose, including, but not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (a) A copy of the judgment of conviction. (b) A transcript of a prior trial, plea-taking, or sentencing. (c) Information contained in a presentence report. (d) The defendant's statement. (4) If the sentence for a conviction under this section is enhanced by 1 or more prior convictions, those prior convictions must not be used to further enhance the sentence for the conviction pursuant to section 10, 11, or 12 of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.10, 769.11, and 769.12. (5) As used in this section, "dating relationship" means frequent, intimate associations primarily characterized by the expectation of affectional involvement. This term does not include a casual relationship or an ordinary fraternization between 2 individuals in a business or social context. Sec. 377b. Maliciously destroying or injuring certain personal propertyï¿½Any A person who shall wilfully willfully and maliciously destroy destroys or injure injures the personal property of any fire or police department, including the Michigan state police, shall be is guilty of a felony. The court shall sentence the person to imprisonment for life or any term of years but not less than 5 years. Sec. 380. (1) A person shall not willfully and maliciously destroy or injure another person's house, barn, or other building or its appurtenances. (2) If any of the following apply, a person who violates subsection (1) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 years, or a fine of not more than $15,000.00 or 3 times the amount of the destruction or injury, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The amount of the destruction or injury is $20,000.00 or more. (b) The person violates subsection (3)(a) and has 2 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (4)(b), (5)(b), (6), or (7). (3) If any of the following apply, a person who violates subsection (1) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more than 5 less than 2 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times the amount of the destruction or injury, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The amount of the destruction or injury is $1,000.00 or more but less than $20,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (4)(a) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section. For purposes of this subdivision, however, a prior conviction does not include a conviction for a violation or attempted violation of subsection (4)(b), (5)(b), (6), or (7). (4) If any of the following apply, a person who violates subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the amount of the destruction or injury, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The amount of the destruction or injury is $200.00 or more but less than $1,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (6) or (7) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to this section. (5) If the person and the property owner are spouses or former spouses, have or have had a dating relationship, have or have had a child in common, or are residents or former residents of the same household and if any of the following apply, the person who violates subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the amount of the destruction or injury, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine: (a) The amount of the destruction or injury is $200.00 or more but less than $1,000.00. (b) The person violates subsection (6) or (7) and has 1 or more prior convictions for committing or attempting to commit an offense under this section or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to this section. (6) If the amount of the destruction or injury is less than $200.00, a person who violates subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $500.00 or 3 times the amount of the destruction or injury, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (7) If the person and the property owner are spouses or former spouses, have or have had a dating relationship, have or have had a child in common, or are residents or former residents of the same household and if the amount of the destruction or injury is less than $200.00, the person who violates subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $500.00 or 3 times the amount of the destruction or injury, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (8) The amounts of the destruction or injury in separate incidents pursuant to a scheme or course of conduct within any 12-month period may be aggregated to determine the total amount of the destruction or injury. (9) If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek an enhanced sentence based upon the defendant having 1 or more prior convictions, the prosecuting attorney shall include on the complaint and information a statement listing the prior conviction or convictions. The existence of the defendant's prior conviction or convictions must be determined by the court, without a jury, at sentencing or at a separate hearing for that purpose before sentencing. The existence of a prior conviction may be established by any evidence relevant for that purpose, including, but not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (a) A copy of the judgment of conviction. (b) A transcript of a prior trial, plea-taking, or sentencing. (c) Information contained in a presentence report. (d) The defendant's statement. (10) If the sentence for a conviction under this section is enhanced by 1 or more prior convictions, those prior convictions must not be used to further enhance the sentence for the conviction pursuant to section 10, 11, or 12 of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, 769.10, 769.11, and 769.12. (11) As used in this section, "dating relationship" means frequent, intimate associations primarily characterized by the expectation of affectional involvement. This term does not include a casual relationship or an ordinary fraternization between 2 individuals in a business or social context. Sec. 383a. A person, without lawful authority, shall not willfully cut, break, obstruct, injure, destroy, tamper with or manipulate, deface, or steal any machinery, tools, equipment, telephone line or post, telegraph line or post, telecommunication line, tower, or post, electric line, post, tower or supporting structures, electric wire, insulator, switch, or signal, natural gas pipeline, water pipeline, steam heat pipeline or the valves or other appliances or equipment appertaining to or used in connection with those lines, or any other appliance or component of the electric, telecommunication, or natural gas infrastructure that is the property of a utility. A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more less than 5 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. As used in this section, "utility" includes any pipeline, gas, electric, heat, water, oil, sewer, telephone, telegraph, telecommunication, radio, railway, railroad, airplane, transportation, communication, or other system, whether or not publicly owned, that is operated for the public use. Sec. 411h. (1) As used in this section: (a) "Course of conduct" means a pattern of conduct composed of a series of 2 or more separate noncontinuous acts evidencing a continuity of purpose. (b) "Dating relationship" means frequent, intimate associations primarily characterized by the expectation of affectional involvement. This term does not include a casual relationship or an ordinary fraternization between 2 individuals in a business or social context. (c) "Emotional distress" means significant mental suffering or distress that may, but does not necessarily, require medical or other professional treatment or counseling. (d) "Harassment" means conduct directed toward a victim that includes, but is not limited to, repeated or continuing unconsented contact that would cause a reasonable individual to suffer emotional distress and that actually causes the victim to suffer emotional distress. Harassment does not include constitutionally protected activity or conduct that serves a legitimate purpose. (e) "Stalking" means a willful course of conduct involving repeated or continuing harassment of another individual that would cause a reasonable person to feel terrorized, frightened, intimidated, threatened, harassed, or molested and that actually causes the victim to feel terrorized, frightened, intimidated, threatened, harassed, or molested. (f) "Unconsented contact" means any contact with another individual that is initiated or continued without that individual's consent or in disregard of that individual's expressed desire that the contact be avoided or discontinued. Unconsented contact includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: (i) Following or appearing within the sight of that individual. (ii) Approaching or confronting that individual in a public place or on private property. (iii) Appearing at that individual's workplace or residence. (iv) Entering onto or remaining on property owned, leased, or occupied by that individual. (v) Contacting that individual by telephone. (vi) Sending mail or electronic communications to that individual. (vii) Placing an object on, or delivering an object to, property owned, leased, or occupied by that individual. (g) "Victim" means an individual who is the target of a willful course of conduct involving repeated or continuing harassment. (2) An individual who engages in stalking is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a misdemeanor punishable by felony, and the court shall sentence the person to imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 1 year 2 years and 6 months or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (b) If the victim was less than 18 years of age at any time during the individual's course of conduct and the individual is 5 or more years older than the victim, a felony punishable by and the court shall sentence the person to imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (c) If the victim and the individual are spouses or former spouses, have or have had a dating relationship, have or have had a child in common, or are residents or former residents of the same household, a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (3) The court may place an individual convicted of violating this section on probation for a term of not more than 5 years. If a term of probation is ordered, the court may, in addition to any other lawful condition of probation, order the defendant to do any of the following: (a) Refrain from stalking any individual during the term of probation. (b) Refrain from having any contact with the victim of the offense. (c) Be evaluated to determine the need for psychiatric, psychological, or social counseling and if, determined appropriate by the court, to receive psychiatric, psychological, or social counseling at the individual's own expense. (3) (4) In a prosecution for a violation of this section, evidence that the defendant continued to engage in a course of conduct involving repeated unconsented contact with the victim after having been requested by the victim to discontinue the same or a different form of unconsented contact, and to refrain from any further unconsented contact with the victim, gives rise to a rebuttable presumption that the continuation of the course of conduct caused the victim to feel terrorized, frightened, intimidated, threatened, harassed, or molested. (4) (5) A criminal penalty provided for under this section may be imposed in addition to any penalty that may be imposed for any other criminal offense arising from the same conduct or for any contempt of court arising from the same conduct. Sec. 411i. (1) As used in this section: (a) "Course of conduct" means a pattern of conduct composed of a series of 2 or more separate noncontinuous acts evidencing a continuity of purpose. (b) "Credible threat" means a threat to kill another individual or a threat to inflict physical injury upon another individual that is made in any manner or in any context that causes the individual hearing or receiving the threat to reasonably fear for his or her safety or the safety of another individual. (c) "Emotional distress" means significant mental suffering or distress that may, but does not necessarily, require medical or other professional treatment or counseling. (d) "Harassment" means conduct directed toward a victim that includes, but is not limited to, repeated or continuing unconsented contact that would cause a reasonable individual to suffer emotional distress and that actually causes the victim to suffer emotional distress. Harassment does not include constitutionally protected activity or conduct that serves a legitimate purpose. (e) "Stalking" means a willful course of conduct involving repeated or continuing harassment of another individual that would cause a reasonable person to feel terrorized, frightened, intimidated, threatened, harassed, or molested and that actually causes the victim to feel terrorized, frightened, intimidated, threatened, harassed, or molested. (f) "Unconsented contact" means any contact with another individual that is initiated or continued without that individual's consent or in disregard of that individual's expressed desire that the contact be avoided or discontinued. Unconsented contact includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: (i) Following or appearing within the sight of that individual. (ii) Approaching or confronting that individual in a public place or on private property. (iii) Appearing at that individual's workplace or residence. (iv) Entering onto or remaining on property owned, leased, or occupied by that individual. (v) Contacting that individual by telephone. (vi) Sending mail or electronic communications to that individual. (vii) Placing an object on, or delivering an object to, property owned, leased, or occupied by that individual. (g) "Victim" means an individual who is the target of a willful course of conduct involving repeated or continuing harassment. (2) An individual who engages in stalking is guilty of aggravated stalking if the violation involves any of the following circumstances: (a) At least 1 of the actions constituting the offense is in violation of a restraining order and the individual has received actual notice of that restraining order or at least 1 of the actions is in violation of an injunction or preliminary injunction. (b) At least 1 of the actions constituting the offense is in violation of a condition of probation, a condition of parole, a condition of pretrial release, or a condition of release on bond pending appeal. (c) The course of conduct includes the making of 1 or more credible threats against the victim, a member of the victim's family, or another individual living in the same household as the victim. (d) The individual has been previously convicted of a violation of this section or section 411h. (3) Aggravated stalking is a felony. punishable as follows: (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), by The court shall sentence the person to imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (b) If the victim was less than 18 years of age at any time during the individual's course of conduct and the individual is 5 or more years older than the victim, by imprisonment for not more than 10 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00, or both. (4) The court may place an individual convicted of violating this section on probation for any term of years, but not less than 5 years. If a term of probation is ordered, the court may, in addition to any other lawful condition of probation, order the defendant to do any of the following: (a) Refrain from stalking any individual during the term of probation. (b) Refrain from any contact with the victim of the offense. (c) Be evaluated to determine the need for psychiatric, psychological, or social counseling and, if determined appropriate by the court, to receive psychiatric, psychological, or social counseling at his or her own expense. (4) (5) In a prosecution for a violation of this section, evidence that the defendant continued to engage in a course of conduct involving repeated unconsented contact with the victim after having been requested by the victim to discontinue the same or a different form of unconsented contact, and to refrain from any further unconsented contact with the victim, gives rise to a rebuttable presumption that the continuation of the course of conduct caused the victim to feel terrorized, frightened, intimidated, threatened, harassed, or molested. (5) (6) A criminal penalty provided for under this section may be imposed in addition to any penalty that may be imposed for any other criminal offense arising from the same conduct or for contempt of court arising from the same conduct. Sec. 411u. (1) If a person who is an associate or a member of a gang commits a felony or attempts to commit a felony and the person's association or membership in the gang provides the motive, means, or opportunity to commit the felony, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 20 10 years. As used in this section: (a) "Gang" means an ongoing organization, association, or group of 5 or more people, other than a nonprofit organization, that identifies itself by all of the following: (i) A unifying mark, manner, protocol, or method of expressing membership, including a common name, sign or symbol, means of recognition, geographical or territorial sites, or boundary or location. (ii) An established leadership or command structure. (iii) Defined membership criteria. (b) "Gang member" or "member of a gang" means a person who belongs to a gang. (2) A sentence imposed under this section is in addition to the sentence imposed for the conviction of the underlying felony or the attempt to commit the underlying felony and may be served consecutively with and preceding any term of imprisonment imposed for the conviction of the felony or attempt to commit the felony. Sec. 451. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person convicted of violating section 448, 449, 449a(1), 450, or 462 is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (2) A person 16 years of age or older who is convicted of violating section 448, 449, 449a(1), 450, or 462 and who has 1 prior conviction is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (3) A person convicted of violating section 448, 449, 449a(1), 450, or 462 and who has 2 or more prior convictions is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (4) A person convicted of violating section 449a(2) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years not more less than 5 20 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (5) If the prosecuting attorney intends to seek an enhanced sentence based upon the defendant having 1 or more prior convictions, the prosecuting attorney shall include on the complaint and information a statement listing the prior conviction or convictions. The existence of the defendant's prior conviction or convictions shall be determined by the court, without a jury, at sentencing or at a separate hearing for that purpose before sentencing. The existence of a prior conviction may be established by any evidence relevant for that purpose, including, but not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (a) A copy of the judgment of conviction. (b) A transcript of a prior trial, plea-taking, or sentencing. (c) Information contained in a presentence report. (d) The defendant's statement. (6) In any prosecution of a person under 18 years of age for an offense punishable under this section or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to an offense punishable under this section, it shall be presumed that the person under 18 years of age was coerced into child sexually abusive activity or commercial sexual activity in violation of section 462e or otherwise forced or coerced into committing that offense by another person engaged in human trafficking in violation of sections 462a to 462h. The prosecution may overcome this presumption by proving beyond a reasonable doubt that the person was not forced or coerced into committing the offense. The state may petition the court to find the person under 18 years of age to be dependent and in danger of substantial physical or psychological harm under section 2(b)(3) of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.2. A person under 18 years of age who fails to substantially comply with court-ordered services under section 2(b)(3) of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.2, is not eligible for the presumption under this section. (7) Excluding any reasonable period of detention for investigation purposes, a law enforcement officer who encounters a person under 18 years of age engaging in any conduct that would be a violation of section 448, 449, 450, or 462, or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to section 448, 449, 450, or 462, if engaged in by a person 16 years of age or over shall immediately report to the department of health and human services a suspected violation of human trafficking involving a person under 18 years of age in violation of sections 462a to 462h. (8) The department of health and human services shall begin an investigation of a human trafficking violation reported to the department of health and human services under subsection (7) within 24 hours after the report is made to the department of health and human services, as provided in section 8 of the child protection law, 1975 PA 238, MCL 722.628. The investigation shall include a determination as to whether the person under 18 years of age is dependent and in danger of substantial physical or psychological harm under section 2(b)(3) of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.2. (9) As used in this section, "prior conviction" means a violation of section 448, 449, 449a(1), 450, or 462 or a violation of a law of another state or of a political subdivision of this state or another state substantially corresponding to section 448, 449, 449a(1), 450, or 462. Sec. 459. (1) A person shall not knowingly transport or cause to be transported, or aid or assist in obtaining transportation for, by any means of conveyance, into, through, or across this state, any person for the purpose of prostitution or with the intent and purpose to induce, entice, or compel that person to become a prostitute. A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more than 20 less than 10 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (2) A person shall not knowingly sell or offer to sell travel services that include or facilitate travel for the purpose of engaging in what would be a violation of this chapter, concerning prostitution, or of chapter LXVIIA, concerning human trafficking, if the violation occurred in this state. Except as provided in subsection (3), a person who violates this subsection is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (3) If a person violates subsection (2) and the violation involves conduct against a minor, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00, or both. (4) A person who violates this section may be prosecuted, indicted, tried, and convicted in any county or city in or through which he or she shall transport or attempt to transport any person in violation of this section. (5) As used in this section, "travel services" means transportation by air, sea, or ground, hotel or other lodging accommodations, package tours, or the provision of vouchers or coupons to be redeemed for future travel, or accommodations for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration. Sec. 479. (1) A person shall not knowingly and willfully do any of the following: (a) Assault, batter, wound, obstruct, or endanger a medical examiner, township treasurer, judge, magistrate, probation officer, parole officer, prosecutor, city attorney, court employee, court officer, or other officer or duly authorized person serving or attempting to serve or execute any process, rule, or order made or issued by lawful authority or otherwise acting in the performance of his or her duties. (b) Assault, batter, wound, obstruct, or endanger an officer enforcing an ordinance, law, rule, order, or resolution of the common council of a city board of trustees, the common council or village council of an incorporated village, or a township board of a township. (2) Except as provided in subsections (3), (4), and (5), a person who violates this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more than 2 years less than 1 year and 6 months or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (3) A person who violates this section and by that violation causes a bodily injury requiring medical attention or medical care to an individual described in this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (4) A person who violates this section and by that violation causes serious impairment of a body function of an individual described in this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (5) A person who violates this section and by that violation causes the death of an individual described in this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (6) This section does not prohibit an individual from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law that is committed by that individual while violating this section. (7) The court may order a term of imprisonment for a violation of this section to be served consecutively to any other term of imprisonment imposed for a violation arising out of the same criminal transaction as the violation of this section. (8) As used in this section: (a) "Obstruct" includes the use or threatened use of physical interference or force or a knowing failure to comply with a lawful command. (b) "Serious impairment of a body function" means that term as defined in section 58c of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.58c. Sec. 479a. (1) An operator of a motor vehicle or vessel who is given by hand, voice, emergency light, or siren a visual or audible signal by a police or conservation officer, acting in the lawful performance of his or her duty, directing the operator to bring his or her motor vehicle or vessel to a stop shall not willfully fail to obey that direction by increasing the speed of the vehicle or vessel, extinguishing the lights of the vehicle or vessel, or otherwise attempting to flee or elude the police or conservation officer. This subsection does not apply unless the police or conservation officer giving the signal is in uniform and the officer's vehicle or vessel is identified as an official police or department of natural resources vehicle or vessel. (2) Except as provided in subsection (3), (4), or (5), an individual who violates subsection (1) is guilty of fourth-degree fleeing and eluding, a felony, punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 2 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (3) Except as provided in subsection (4) or (5), an individual who violates subsection (1) is guilty of third-degree fleeing and eluding, a felony, punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 4 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both, if 1 or more of the following circumstances apply: (a) The violation results in a collision or accident. (b) For a motor vehicle, a portion of the violation occurred in an area where the speed limit is 35 miles an hour or less, whether that speed limit is posted or imposed as a matter of law or, for a vessel, a portion of the violation occurred in an area designated as "slowï¿½ï¿½no wake", "no wake", or "restricted" whether the area is posted or created by law or administrative rule. (c) The individual has a prior conviction for fourth-degree fleeing and eluding, attempted fourth-degree fleeing and eluding, or fleeing and eluding under a current or former law of this state prohibiting substantially similar conduct. (4) Except as provided in subsection (5), an individual who violates subsection (1) is guilty of second-degree fleeing and eluding, a felony, punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 6 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both, if 1 or more of the following circumstances apply: (a) The violation results in serious impairment of a body function of an individual. (b) The individual has 1 or more prior convictions for first-, second-, or third-degree fleeing and eluding, attempted first-, second-, or third-degree fleeing and eluding, or fleeing and eluding under a current or former law of this state prohibiting substantially similar conduct. (c) The individual has any combination of 2 or more prior convictions for fourth-degree fleeing and eluding, attempted fourth-degree fleeing and eluding, or fleeing and eluding under a current or former law of this state prohibiting substantially similar conduct. (5) If the violation results in the death of another individual, an individual who violates subsection (1) is guilty of first-degree fleeing and eluding, a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00, or both. (6) Upon a conviction for a violation or attempted violation under subsection (2) or (3), the following apply: (a) If the individual was operating a motor vehicle, the secretary of state shall suspend the individual's operator's or chauffeur's license as provided in section 319 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.319. (b) If the individual was operating a vessel, the individual's privilege to operate a vessel shall be suspended for a period not to exceed 5 years. (7) Upon a conviction for a violation or attempted violation under subsection (4) or (5), the following apply: (a) If the individual was operating a motor vehicle, the secretary of state shall revoke the individual's operator's or chauffeur's license as provided in section 303 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.303. (b) If the individual was operating a vessel, the individual's privilege to operate a vessel shall be revoked for a period of not less than 5 years. (8) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a conviction under this section does not prohibit a conviction and sentence under any other applicable provision for conduct arising out of the same transaction. A conviction under subsection (2), (3), (4), or (5) prohibits a conviction under section 602a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.602a, for conduct arising out of the same transaction. (9) As used in this section: (a) "Prior conviction" means: (i) For a violation of this section while operating a motor vehicle, the person had a previous conviction for a violation of this section while operating a motor vehicle or a previous conviction for fleeing and eluding under a current or former law of this state prohibiting substantially similar conduct while operating a motor vehicle. (ii) For a violation of this section while operating a vessel, the person had a previous conviction for a violation of this section while operating a vessel. (b) "Serious impairment of a body function" means that term as defined in section 58c of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.58c. (c) "Vessel" means that term as defined in section 80104 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80104. (10) This section shall may be known and may be cited as the "Lieutenant Donald Bezenah law". Sec. 479b. (1) An individual who takes a weapon other than a firearm from the lawful possession of a peace officer or a corrections officer is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 4 years or a fine of not more than $2,500.00, or both, if all of the following circumstances exist at the time the weapon is taken: (a) The individual knows or has reason to believe the person from whom the weapon is taken is a peace officer or a corrections officer. (b) The peace officer or corrections officer is performing his or her duties as a peace officer or a corrections officer. (c) The individual takes the weapon without consent of the peace officer or corrections officer. (d) The peace officer or corrections officer is authorized by his or her employer to carry the weapon in the line of duty. (2) An individual who takes a firearm from the lawful possession of a peace officer or a corrections officer is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 4 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both, if all of the following circumstances exist at the time the firearm is taken: (a) The individual knows or has reason to believe the person from whom the firearm is taken is a peace officer or a corrections officer. (b) The peace officer or corrections officer is performing his or her duties as a peace officer or a corrections officer. (c) The individual takes the firearm without the consent of the peace officer or corrections officer. (d) The peace officer or corrections officer is authorized by his or her employer to carry the firearm in the line of duty. (3) This section does not prohibit an individual from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law that is committed by that individual while violating this section. (4) A term of imprisonment imposed for a violation of this section may run consecutively to any term of imprisonment imposed for another violation arising from the same transaction. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Corrections officer" means a prison or jail guard or other employee of a jail or a state or federal correctional facility, who performs duties involving the transportation, care, custody, or supervision of prisoners. (b) "Peace officer" means 1 or more of the following: (i) A police officer of this state or a political subdivision of this state. (ii) A police officer of any entity of the United States. (iii) The sheriff of a county of this state or the sheriff's deputy. (iv) A public safety officer of a college or university who is authorized by the governing board of that college or university to enforce state law and the rules and ordinances of that college or university. (v) A conservation officer of the department of natural resources. (vi) A conservation officer of the United States department of interior.Department of the Interior. Sec. 483a. (1) A person shall not do any of the following: (a) Withhold or refuse to produce any testimony, information, document, or thing after the court has ordered it to be produced following a hearing. (b) Prevent or attempt to prevent through the unlawful use of physical force another person from reporting a crime committed or attempted by another person. (c) Intentionally use the person's professional position of authority over another person to prevent or attempt to prevent the other person from reporting a crime listed in section 136b, 520b, 520c, 520d, 520e, or 520g, that is committed or attempted by another person. (d) Retaliate or attempt to retaliate against another person for having reported or attempted to report a crime committed or attempted by another person. As used in this subdivision, "retaliate" means to do any of the following: (i) Commit or attempt to commit a crime against any person. (ii) Threaten to kill or injure any person or threaten to cause property damage. (2) A person who violates subsection (1) is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (b) If the violation involves committing or attempting to commit a crime or a threat to kill or injure any person or to cause property damage, the person is guilty of a felony. punishable by The court shall sentence the person to imprisonment for not more than 10 5 years or and may impose a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (3) A person shall not do any of the following: (a) Give, offer to give, or promise anything of value to any person to influence a person's statement to a police officer conducting a lawful investigation of a crime or the presentation of evidence to a police officer conducting a lawful investigation of a crime. (b) Threaten or intimidate any person to influence a person's statement to a police officer conducting a lawful investigation of a crime or the presentation of evidence to a police officer conducting a lawful investigation of a crime. (4) A person who violates subsection (3) is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (b) If the violation involves committing or attempting to commit a crime or a threat to kill or injure any person or to cause property damage, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (5) A person shall not do any of the following: (a) Knowingly and intentionally remove, alter, conceal, destroy, or otherwise tamper with evidence to be offered in a present or future official proceeding. (b) Offer evidence at an official proceeding that the person recklessly disregards as false. (6) A person who violates subsection (5) is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the person is guilty of a felony, punishable by and the court shall sentence the person to imprisonment for not more than 4 2 years or and 6 months and may impose a fine of not more than $5,000.00. , or both. (b) If the violation is committed in a criminal case for which the maximum term of imprisonment for the violation is more than 10 years, or the violation is punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (7) It is an affirmative defense under subsection (3), for which the defendant has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence, that the conduct consisted solely of lawful conduct and that the defendant's sole intention was to encourage, induce, or cause the other person to provide a statement or evidence truthfully. (8) Subsections (1)(a), (3)(b), and (5)(b) do not apply to any of the following: (a) The lawful conduct of an attorney in the performance of the attorney's duties, such as advising a client. (b) The lawful conduct or communications of a person as permitted by statute or other lawful privilege. (9) This section does not prohibit a person from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law arising out of the same transaction as the violation of this section. (10) The court may order a term of imprisonment imposed for a violation of this section to be served consecutively to a term of imprisonment imposed for any other crime including any other violation of law arising out of the same transaction as the violation of this section. (11) As used in this section: (a) "Official proceeding" means a proceeding heard before a legislative, judicial, administrative, or other governmental agency or official authorized to hear evidence under oath, including a referee, prosecuting attorney, hearing examiner, commissioner, notary, or other person taking testimony or deposition in that proceeding. (b) "Threaten or intimidate" does not mean a communication regarding the otherwise lawful access to courts or other branches of government, such as the lawful filing of any civil action or police report of which the purpose is not to harass the other person in violation of section 2907 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2907. Sec. 520b. (1) A person is guilty of criminal sexual conduct in the first degree if he or she engages in sexual penetration with another person and if any of the following circumstances exists:exist: (a) That other person is under 13 years of age. (b) That other person is at least 13 but less than 16 years of age and any of the following: (i) The actor is a member of the same household as the victim. (ii) The actor is related to the victim by blood or affinity to the fourth degree. (iii) The actor is in a position of authority over the victim and used this authority to coerce the victim to submit. (iv) The actor is a teacher, substitute teacher, or administrator of the public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district in which that other person is enrolled. (v) The actor is an employee or a contractual service provider of the public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district in which that other person is enrolled, or is a volunteer who is not a student in any public school or nonpublic school, or is an employee of this state or of a local unit of government of this state or of the United States assigned to provide any service to that public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district, and the actor uses his or her employee, contractual, or volunteer status to gain access to, or to establish a relationship with, that other person. (vi) The actor is an employee, contractual service provider, or volunteer of a child care organization, or a person licensed to operate a foster family home or a foster family group home in which that other person is a resident, and the sexual penetration occurs during the period of that other person's residency. As used in this subparagraph, "child care organization", "foster family home", and "foster family group home" mean those terms as defined in section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (c) Sexual penetration occurs under circumstances involving the commission of any other felony. (d) The actor is aided or abetted by 1 or more other persons and either of the following circumstances exists: (i) The actor knows or has reason to know that the victim is mentally incapable, mentally incapacitated, or physically helpless. (ii) The actor uses force or coercion to accomplish the sexual penetration. Force or coercion includes, but is not limited to, any of the circumstances listed in subdivision (f). (e) The actor is armed with a weapon or any article used or fashioned in a manner to lead the victim to reasonably believe it to be a weapon. (f) The actor causes personal injury to the victim and force or coercion is used to accomplish sexual penetration. Force or coercion includes, but is not limited to, any of the following circumstances: (i) When the actor overcomes the victim through the actual application of physical force or physical violence. (ii) When the actor coerces the victim to submit by threatening to use force or violence on the victim, and the victim believes that the actor has the present ability to execute these threats. (iii) When the actor coerces the victim to submit by threatening to retaliate in the future against the victim, or any other person, and the victim believes that the actor has the ability to execute this threat. As used in this subdivision, "to retaliate" includes threats of physical punishment, kidnapping, or extortion. (iv) When the actor engages in the medical treatment or examination of the victim in a manner or for purposes that are medically recognized as unethical or unacceptable. (v) When the actor, through concealment or by the element of surprise, is able to overcome the victim. (g) The actor causes personal injury to the victim, and the actor knows or has reason to know that the victim is mentally incapable, mentally incapacitated, or physically helpless. (h) That other person is mentally incapable, mentally disabled, mentally incapacitated, or physically helpless, and any of the following: (i) The actor is related to the victim by blood or affinity to the fourth degree. (ii) The actor is in a position of authority over the victim and used this authority to coerce the victim to submit. (2) Criminal sexual conduct in the first degree is a felony punishable as follows: (a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), by imprisonment for life or for any term of years, but not less than 15 years. (b) For a violation that is committed by an individual 17 years of age or older against an individual less than 13 years of age by imprisonment for life or any term of years, but not less than 25 years. (c) For a violation that is committed by an individual 18 years of age or older against an individual less than 13 years of age, by imprisonment for life without the possibility of parole if the person was previously convicted of a violation of this section or section 520c, 520d, 520e, or 520g committed against an individual less than 13 years of age or a violation of law of the United States, another state or political subdivision substantially corresponding to a violation of this section or section 520c, 520d, 520e, or 520g committed against an individual less than 13 years of age. (3) (d) In addition to any other penalty imposed under subdivision (a) or (b), subsection (2), the court shall sentence the defendant to lifetime electronic monitoring under section 520n. (4) (3) The court may order a term of imprisonment imposed under this section to be served consecutively to any term of imprisonment imposed for any other criminal offense arising from the same transaction. Sec. 520c. (1) A person is guilty of criminal sexual conduct in the second degree if the person engages in sexual contact with another person and if any of the following circumstances exists:exist: (a) That other person is under 13 years of age. (b) That other person is at least 13 but less than 16 years of age and any of the following: (i) The actor is a member of the same household as the victim. (ii) The actor is related by blood or affinity to the fourth degree to the victim. (iii) The actor is in a position of authority over the victim and the actor used this authority to coerce the victim to submit. (iv) The actor is a teacher, substitute teacher, or administrator of the public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district in which that other person is enrolled. (v) The actor is an employee or a contractual service provider of the public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district in which that other person is enrolled, or is a volunteer who is not a student in any public school or nonpublic school, or is an employee of this state or of a local unit of government of this state or of the United States assigned to provide any service to that public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district, and the actor uses his or her employee, contractual, or volunteer status to gain access to, or to establish a relationship with, that other person. (vi) The actor is an employee, contractual service provider, or volunteer of a child care organization, or a person licensed to operate a foster family home or a foster family group home in which that other person is a resident and the sexual contact occurs during the period of that other person's residency. As used in this subdivision, "child care organization", "foster family home", and "foster family group home" mean those terms as defined in section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (c) Sexual contact occurs under circumstances involving the commission of any other felony. (d) The actor is aided or abetted by 1 or more other persons and either of the following circumstances exists: (i) The actor knows or has reason to know that the victim is mentally incapable, mentally incapacitated, or physically helpless. (ii) The actor uses force or coercion to accomplish the sexual contact. Force or coercion includes, but is not limited to, any of the circumstances listed in section 520b(1)(f). (e) The actor is armed with a weapon, or any article used or fashioned in a manner to lead a person to reasonably believe it to be a weapon. (f) The actor causes personal injury to the victim and force or coercion is used to accomplish the sexual contact. Force or coercion includes, but is not limited to, any of the circumstances listed in section 520b(1)(f). (g) The actor causes personal injury to the victim and the actor knows or has reason to know that the victim is mentally incapable, mentally incapacitated, or physically helpless. (h) That other person is mentally incapable, mentally disabled, mentally incapacitated, or physically helpless, and any of the following: (i) The actor is related to the victim by blood or affinity to the fourth degree. (ii) The actor is in a position of authority over the victim and used this authority to coerce the victim to submit. (i) That other person is under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections and the actor is an employee or a contractual employee of, or a volunteer with, the department of corrections who knows that the other person is under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections. (j) That other person is under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections and the actor is an employee or a contractual employee of, or a volunteer with, a private vendor that operates a youth correctional facility under section 20g of the corrections code of 1953, 1953 PA 232, MCL 791.220g, who knows that the other person is under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections. (k) That other person is a prisoner or probationer under the jurisdiction of a county for purposes of imprisonment or a work program or other probationary program and the actor is an employee or a contractual employee of or a volunteer with the county or the department of corrections who knows that the other person is under the county's jurisdiction. (l) The actor knows or has reason to know that a court has detained the victim in a facility while the victim is awaiting a trial or hearing, or committed the victim to a facility as a result of the victim having been found responsible for committing an act that would be a crime if committed by an adult, and the actor is an employee or contractual employee of, or a volunteer with, the facility in which the victim is detained or to which the victim was committed. (2) Criminal sexual conduct in the second degree is a felony punishable as follows: (a) By by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 15 10 years. (3) (b) In addition to the penalty specified in subdivision (a), the court shall sentence the defendant to lifetime electronic monitoring under section 520n if the violation involved sexual contact committed by an individual 17 years of age or older against an individual less than 13 years of age. Sec. 520d. (1) A person is guilty of criminal sexual conduct in the third degree if the person engages in sexual penetration with another person and if any of the following circumstances exist: (a) That other person is at least 13 years of age and under 16 years of age. (b) Force or coercion is used to accomplish the sexual penetration. Force or coercion includes but is not limited to any of the circumstances listed in section 520b(1)(f)(i) to (v). (c) The actor knows or has reason to know that the victim is mentally incapable, mentally incapacitated, or physically helpless. (d) That other person is related to the actor by blood or affinity to the third degree and the sexual penetration occurs under circumstances not otherwise prohibited by this chapter. It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this subdivision that the other person was in a position of authority over the defendant and used this authority to coerce the defendant to violate this subdivision. The defendant has the burden of proving this defense by a preponderance of the evidence. This subdivision does not apply if both persons are lawfully married to each other at the time of the alleged violation. (e) That other person is at least 16 years of age but less than 18 years of age and a student at a public school or nonpublic school, and either of the following applies: (i) The actor is a teacher, substitute teacher, or administrator of that public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district. This subparagraph does not apply if the other person is emancipated at the time of the alleged violation. (ii) The actor is an employee or a contractual service provider of the public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district in which that other person is enrolled, or is a volunteer who is not a student in any public school or nonpublic school, or is an employee of this state or of a local unit of government of this state or of the United States assigned to provide any service to that public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district, and the actor uses the actor's employee, contractual, or volunteer status to gain access to, or to establish a relationship with, that other person. (f) That other person is at least 16 years old but less than 26 years of age and is receiving special education services, and either of the following applies: (i) The actor is a teacher, substitute teacher, administrator, employee, or contractual service provider of the public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district from which that other person receives the special education services. This subparagraph does not apply if both persons are not less than 18 years of age and were lawfully married to each other at the time of the alleged violation. (ii) The actor is a volunteer who is not a student in any public school or nonpublic school, or is an employee of this state or of a local unit of government of this state or of the United States assigned to provide any service to that public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district, and the actor uses the actor's employee, contractual, or volunteer status to gain access to, or to establish a relationship with, that other person. (g) The actor is an employee, contractual service provider, or volunteer of a child care organization, or a person licensed to operate a foster family home or a foster family group home, in which that other person is a resident, that other person is at least 16 years of age, and the sexual penetration occurs during that other person's residency. As used in this subdivision, "child care organization", "foster family home", and "foster family group home" mean those terms as defined in section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (2) Criminal sexual conduct in the third degree is a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 15 5 years. Sec. 520e. (1) A person is guilty of criminal sexual conduct in the fourth degree if the person engages in sexual contact with another person and if any of the following circumstances exist: (a) That other person is at least 13 years of age but less than 16 years of age, and the actor is 5 or more years older than that other person. (b) Force or coercion is used to accomplish the sexual contact. Force or coercion includes, but is not limited to, any of the following circumstances: (i) When the actor overcomes the victim through the actual application of physical force or physical violence. (ii) When the actor coerces the victim to submit by threatening to use force or violence on the victim, and the victim believes that the actor has the present ability to execute that threat. (iii) When the actor coerces the victim to submit by threatening to retaliate in the future against the victim, or any other person, and the victim believes that the actor has the ability to execute that threat. As used in this subparagraph, "to retaliate" includes threats of physical punishment, kidnapping, or extortion. (iv) When the actor engages in the medical treatment or examination of the victim in a manner or for purposes which are medically recognized as unethical or unacceptable. (v) When the actor achieves the sexual contact through concealment or by the element of surprise. (c) The actor knows or has reason to know that the victim is mentally incapable, mentally incapacitated, or physically helpless. (d) That other person is related to the actor by blood or affinity to the third degree and the sexual contact occurs under circumstances not otherwise prohibited by this chapter. It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this subdivision that the other person was in a position of authority over the defendant and used this authority to coerce the defendant to violate this subdivision. The defendant has the burden of proving this defense by a preponderance of the evidence. This subdivision does not apply if both persons are lawfully married to each other at the time of the alleged violation. (e) The actor is a mental health professional and the sexual contact occurs during or within 2 years after the period in which the victim is the actor's client or patient and not the actor's spouse. The consent of the victim is not a defense to a prosecution under this subdivision. A prosecution under this subsection shall not be used as evidence that the victim is mentally incompetent. (f) That other person is at least 16 years of age but less than 18 years of age and a student at a public school or nonpublic school, and either of the following applies: (i) The actor is a teacher, substitute teacher, or administrator of that public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district. This subparagraph does not apply if the other person is emancipated at the time of the alleged violation. (ii) The actor is an employee or a contractual service provider of the public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district in which that other person is enrolled, or is a volunteer who is not a student in any public school or nonpublic school, or is an employee of this state or of a local unit of government of this state or of the United States assigned to provide any service to that public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district, and the actor uses the actor's employee, contractual, or volunteer status to gain access to, or to establish a relationship with, that other person. (g) That other person is at least 16 years old but less than 26 years of age and is receiving special education services, and either of the following applies: (i) The actor is a teacher, substitute teacher, administrator, employee, or contractual service provider of the public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district from which that other person receives the special education services. This subparagraph does not apply if both persons are not less than 18 years of age and were lawfully married to each other at the time of the alleged violation. (ii) The actor is a volunteer who is not a student in any public school or nonpublic school, or is an employee of this state or of a local unit of government of this state or of the United States assigned to provide any service to that public school, nonpublic school, school district, or intermediate school district, and the actor uses the actor's employee, contractual, or volunteer status to gain access to, or to establish a relationship with, that other person. (h) The actor is an employee, contractual service provider, or volunteer of a child care organization, or a person licensed to operate a foster family home or a foster family group home, in which that other person is a resident, that other person is at least 16 years of age, and the sexual contact occurs during that other person's residency. As used in this subdivision, "child care organization", "foster family home", and "foster family group home" mean those terms as defined in section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (2) Criminal sexual conduct in the fourth degree is a misdemeanor felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 2 years and 6 months or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. Sec. 520g. (1) Assault with intent to commit criminal sexual conduct involving sexual penetration shall be is a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 10 20 years. (2) Assault with intent to commit criminal sexual conduct in the second degree is a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more less than 5 10 years. Sec. 529. (1) A person who engages in conduct proscribed under section 530 and who in the course of engaging in that conduct does any of the following is guilty of armed robbery: (a) Possesses a dangerous weapon. (b) Possesses an article used or fashioned in a manner that would cause a reasonable person to believe the article is a dangerous weapon. (c) Represents orally or otherwise that he or she possesses a dangerous weapon. (2) A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or for any term of years but not less than 10 years. (3) If a violation of this section results in an aggravated assault of or serious injury to any other person, the person must be sentenced to a minimum term of imprisonment of not less than 2 years. Sec. 529a. (1) A person who in the course of committing a larceny of a motor vehicle uses force or violence or the threat of force or violence, or who puts in fear any operator, passenger, or person in lawful possession of the motor vehicle, or any person lawfully attempting to recover the motor vehicle, is guilty of carjacking, a felony, punishable by imprisonment for life or for any term of years but not less than 5 years. (2) As used in this section, "in the course of committing a larceny of a motor vehicle" includes acts that occur in an attempt to commit the larceny, or during commission of the larceny, or in flight or attempted flight after the commission of the larceny, or in an attempt to retain possession of the motor vehicle. (3) A sentence imposed for a violation of this section may be imposed to run consecutively to any other sentence imposed for a conviction that arises out of the same transaction. Sec. 530. (1) A person who, in the course of committing a larceny of any money or other property that may be the subject of larceny, uses force or violence against any person who is present, or who assaults or puts the person in fear, is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not more than 15 less than 5 years. (2) As used in this section, "in the course of committing a larceny" includes acts that occur in an attempt to commit the larceny, or during commission of the larceny, or in flight or attempted flight after the commission of the larceny, or in an attempt to retain possession of the property. Sec. 531. Bank, safe and vault robberyï¿½Any A person who, with intent to commit the crime of larceny, or any felony, shall confine, maim, injure confines, maims, injures, or wound, wounds, or attempt, attempts or threaten threatens to confine, kill, maim, injure, or wound, or shall put who puts in fear any person for the purpose of stealing from any building, bank, safe, or other depository of money, bond, or other valuables, or shall who by intimidation, fear, or threats compel, compels or attempt attempts to compel any person to disclose or surrender the means of opening any building, bank, safe, vault, or other depository of money, bonds, or other valuables, or shall attempt who attempts to break, burn, blow up, or otherwise injure or destroy any safe, vault, or other depository of money, bonds, or other valuables in any building or place, shall, is, whether he the person succeeds or fails in the perpetration of such larceny or felony, be guilty of a felony , punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for life or any term of years but not less than 5 years. Sec. 553. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), an individual who occupies a building that is a single-family dwelling or 1 or both units in a building that is a 2-family dwelling and has not, at any time during that period of occupancy, occupied the property with the owner's consent for an agreed-upon consideration is guilty of a crime as follows: (a) For a first offense, a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $5,000.00 per dwelling unit occupied or imprisonment for not more than 180 days, or both. (b) For a second or subsequent offense, a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years but not less than 1 year or a fine of not more than $10,000.00 per dwelling unit occupied, or imprisonment for not more than 2 years, or both. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to a guest or a family member of the owner of the dwelling or of a tenant. Enacting section 1. Section 145g of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.145g, is repealed. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.